 Rosa Luxemburg

 1900

 This document prepared from the text available through the Marxist
Internet Archive (marxists.org).


Table of Contents

Introduction >

Part One >

Chapter 1 The Opportunist Method >
Chapter 2 The Adaptation of Capital >
Chapter 3 The Realisation of Socialism through Social Reforms >
Chapter 4 Capitalism and the State >
Chapter 5 The Consequences of Social Reformism and General Nature of
Reformism >

Part Two >

Chapter 6 Economic Development and Socialism >
Chapter 7 Co-operatives, Unions, Democracy >
Chapter 8 Conquest of Political Power >
Chapter 9 Collapse >
Chapter 10 Opportunism and Theory in Practice >

 INTRODUCTION


 At first view the title of this work may be found surprising. Can the
Social-Democracy be against reforms? Can we contrapose the social
revolution, the transformation of the existing order, our final goal, to
social reforms? Certainly not. The daily struggle for reforms, for the
amelioration of the condition of the workers within the framework of the
existing social order, and for democratic institutions, offers to the
Social-Democracy an indissoluble tie. The struggle for reforms is its
means; the social revolution, its aim.

 It is in Eduard Bernstein’s theory, presented in his articles on
_Problems of Socialism_, NEUE ZEIT of 1897-98, and in his book _Die
Voraussetzungen des Socialismus und die Aufgaben der Sozialdemokratie_

1

 _The Pre-Conditions of Socialism and the Tasks for Social Democracy_
[_English translation: Evolutionary Socialism_]

that we find, for the first time, the opposition of the two factors of
the labour movement. His theory tends to counsel us to renounce the
social transformation, the final goal of Social-Democracy and,
inversely, to make of social reforms, the means of the class struggle,
its aim. Bernstein himself has very clearly and characteristically
formulated this viewpoint when he wrote: “The Final goal, no matter what
it is, is nothing; the movement is everything.”

 But since the final goal of socialism constitutes the only decisive
factor distinguishing the Social-Democratic movement from bourgeois
democracy and from bourgeois radicalism, the only factor transforming
the entire labour movement from a vain effort to repair the capitalist
order into a class struggle against this order, for the suppression of
this order – the question: “Reform or Revolution?” as it is posed by
Bernstein, equals for the Social-Democracy the question: “To be or not
to be?” In the controversy with Bernstein and his followers, everybody
in the Party ought to understand clearly it is not a question of this or
that method of struggle, or the use of this or that set of tactics, but
of the very existence of the Social-Democratic movement.

 Upon a casual consideration of Bernstein’s theory, this may appear like
an exaggeration. Does he not continually mention the Social-Democracy
and its aims? Does he not repeat again and again, in very explicit
language, that he too strives toward the final goal of socialism, but in
another way? Does he not stress particularly that he fully approves of
the present practice of the Social-Democracy?

 That is all true, to be sure. It is also true that every new movement,
when it first elaborates its theory and policy, begins by finding
support in the preceding movement, though it may be in direct
contradiction with the latter. It begins by suiting itself to the forms
found at hand and by speaking the language spoken hereto. In time the
new grain breaks through the old husk. The new movement finds its forms
and its own language.

 To expect an opposition against scientific socialism at its very
beginning, to express itself clearly, fully and to the last consequence
on the subject of its real content: to expect it to deny openly and
bluntly the theoretic basis of the Social-Democracy – would amount to
underrating the power of scientific socialism. Today he who wants to
pass as a socialist, and at the same time declare war on Marxian
doctrine, the most stupendous product of the human mind in the century,
must begin with involuntary esteem for Marx. He must begin by
acknowledging himself to be his disciple, by seeking in Marx’s own
teachings the points of support for an attack on the latter, while he
represents this attack as a further development of Marxian doctrine. On
this account, we must, unconcerned by its outer forms, pick out the
sheathed kernel of Bernstein’s theory. This is a matter of urgent
necessity for the broad layers of the industrial proletariat in our
Party.

 No coarser insult, no baser aspersion, can be thrown against the
workers than the remarks: “Theocratic controversies are only for
academicians.” Some time ago Lassalle said: “Only when science and the
workers, these opposite poles of society, become one, will they crush in
their arms of steel all obstacles to culture.” The entire strength of
the modern labour movement rests on theoretic knowledge.

 But doubly important is this knowledge for the workers in the present
case, because it is precisely they and their influence in the movement
that are in the balance here. It is their skin that is being brought to
market. The opportunist theory in the Party, the theory formulated by
Bernstein, is nothing else than an unconscious attempt to assure
predominance to the petty-bourgeois elements that have entered our
Party, to change the policy and aims of our Party in their direction.
The question of reform or revolution, of the final goal and the
movement, is basically, in another form, but the question of the
petty-bourgeois or proletarian character of the labour movement.

 It is, therefore, in the interest of the proletarian mass of the Party
to become acquainted, actively and in detail, with the present theoretic
knowledge remains the privilege of a handful of “academicians” in the
Party, the latter will face the danger of going astray. Only when the
great mass of workers take the keen and dependable weapons of scientific
socialism in their own hands, will all the petty-bourgeois inclinations,
all the opportunistic currents, come to naught. The movement will then
find itself on sure and firm ground. “Quantity will do it”.

 _ROSA LUXEMBURG_



 PART ONE



CHAPTER 1  THE OPPORTUNIST METHOD


 If it is true that theories are only the images of the phenomena of the
exterior world in the human consciousness, it must be added, concerning
Eduard Bernstein’s system, that theories are sometimes inverted images.
Think of a theory of instituting socialism by means of social reforms in
the face of the complete stagnation of the reform movement in Germany.
Think of a theory of trade union control. Consider the theory of winning
a majority in Parliament, after the revision of the constitution of
Saxony and in view of the most recent attempts against universal
suffrage. However, the pivotal point of Bernstein’s system is not
located in his conception of the practical tasks of the
Social-Democracy. It is found in his stand on the course of the
objective development of capitalist society, which, in turn is closely
bound to his conception of the practical tasks of the Social-Democracy.

 According to Bernstein, a general decline of capitalism seems to be
increasingly improbable because, on the one hand, capitalism shows a
greater capacity of adaptation, and, on the other hand, capitalist
production becomes more and more varied.

 The capacity of capitalism to adapt itself, says Bernstein, is
manifested first in the disappearance of general crises, resulting from
the development of the credit system, employers’ organisations, wider
means of communication and informational services. It shows itself
secondly, in the tenacity of the middle classes, which hails from the
growing differentiation of the branches of production and the elevation
of vast layers of the proletariat to the level of the middle class. It
is furthermore proved, argues Bernstein, by the amelioration of the
economic and political situation of the proletariat as a result of its
trade union activity.

 From this theoretic stand is derived the following general conclusion
about the practical work of the Social-Democracy. The latter must not
direct its daily activity toward the conquest of political power, but
toward the betterment of the condition of the working class, within the
existing order. It must not expect to institute socialism as a result of
a political and social crisis, but should build socialism by means of
the progressive extension of social control and the gradual application
of the principle of co-operation.

 Bernstein himself sees nothing new in his theories. On the contrary, he
believes them to be in agreement with certain declarations of Marx and
Engels. Nevertheless, it seems to us that it is difficult to deny that
they are in formal contradiction with the conceptions of scientific
socialism.

 If Bernstein’s revisionism merely consisted in affirming that the march
of capitalist development is slower than was thought before, he would
merely be presenting an argument for adjourning the conquest of power by
the proletariat, on which everybody agreed up to now. Its only
consequence would be a slowing up of the pace of the struggle.

 But that is not the case. What Bernstein questions is not the rapidity
of the development of capitalist society, but the march of the
development itself and, consequently, the very possibility of a change
to socialism.

 Socialist theory up to now declared that the point of departure for a
transformation to socialism would be a general and catastrophic crisis.
We must distinguish in this outlook two things: the fundamental idea and
its exterior form.

 The fundamental idea consists of the affirmation that capitalism, as a
result of its own inner contradictions, moves toward a point when it
will be unbalanced, when it will simply become impossible. There were
good reasons for conceiving that juncture in the form of a catastrophic
general commercial crisis. But that is of secondary importance when the
fundamental idea is considered.

 The scientific basis of socialism rests, as is well known, on three
principal results of capitalist development. First, on the growing
anarchy of capitalist economy, leading inevitably to its ruin. Second,
on the progressive socialisation of the process of production, which
creates the germs of the future social order. And third, on the
increased organisation and consciousness of the proletarian class, which
constitutes the active factor in the coming revolution.

 Bernstein pulls away from the first of the three fundamental supports
of scientific socialism. He says that capitalist development does not
lead to a general economic collapse.

 He does not merely reject a certain form of the collapse. He rejects
the very possibility of collapse. He says textually: “One could claim
that by collapse of the present society is meant something else than a
general commercial crisis, worse than all others, that is a complete
collapse of the capitalist system brought about as a result of its own
contradictions.” And to this he replies: “With the growing development
of society a complete and almost general collapse of the present system
of production becomes more and more improbable, because capitalist
development increases on the one hand the capacity of adaptation and, on
the other – that is at the same time, the differentiation of industry.

1

 _Neue Zeit_, 1897-98, vol.18, pg.555

”

 But then the question arises: Why and how, in that case, can we attain
the final goal? According to scientific socialism, the historic
necessity of the socialist revolution manifests itself above all in the
growing anarchy of capitalism, which drives the system into an impasse.
But if one admits with Bernstein that capitalist development does not
move in the direction of its own ruin, then socialism ceases to be
objectively necessary. There remain the other two mainstays of the
scientific explanation of socialism, which are also said to be
consequences of capitalism itself: the socialisation of the process of
production and the growing consciousness of the proletariat. It is these
two matters that Bernstein has in mind when he says: “The suppression of
the theory of collapse does not in any way deprive socialist doctrine of
the power of persuasion. For, examined closely, what are all factors
enumerated by us that make for the suppression or the modification of
the former crises? Nothing else, in fact, than the conditions, or even
in party the germs, of the socialisation of production and exchange.

2

 Ibid., pg. 554

”

 Very little reflection is needed to understand that here too we face a
false conclusion. Where lies the importance of all the phenomena that
are said by Bernstein to be the means of capitalist adaptation –
cartels, the credit system, the development of means of communication,
the amelioration of the situation of the working class, etc.? Obviously,
in that they suppress or, at least, attenuate the internal
contradictions of capitalist economy, and stop the development or the
aggravation of these contradictions. Thus the suppression of crises can
only mean the suppression of the antagonism between production and
exchange on the capitalist base. The amelioration of the situation of
the working class, or the penetration of certain fractions of the class
into middle layers, can only mean the attenuation of the antagonism
between Capital and Labour. But if the mention factors suppress the
capitalist contradictions and consequently save the system from ruin, if
they enable capitalism to maintain itself – and that is why Bernstein
calls them “means of adaptation” – how can cartels, the credit system,
trade unions, etc., be at the same time “the conditions and even, in
part, the germs” of socialism? Obviously only in the sense that they
express most clearly the social character of production.

 But by presenting it in its capitalist form, the same factors render
superfluous, inversely, in the same measure, the transformation of this
socialised production into socialist production. That is why they can be
the germs or conditions of a socialist order only in a theoretic sense
and not in an historic sense. They are phenomena which, in the light of
our conception of socialism, we know to be related to socialism but
which, in fact, not only do not lead to a socialist revolution but
render it, on the contrary, superfluous.

 There remains one force making for socialism – the class consciousness
of the proletariat. But it, too, is in the given case no the simple
intellectual reflection of the growing contradictions of capitalism and
its approaching decline. It is now no more than an ideal whose force of
persuasion rests only on the perfection attributed to it.

 We have here, in brief, the explanation of the socialist programme by
means of “pure reason.” We have here, to use simpler language, an
idealist explanation of socialism. The objective necessity of socialism,
the explanation of socialism as the result of the material development
of society, falls to the ground.

 Revisionist theory thus places itself in a dilemma. Either the
socialist transformation is, as was admitted up to now, the consequence
of the internal contradictions of capitalism, and with the growth of
capitalism will develop its inner contradictions, resulting inevitably,
at some point, in its collapse, (in that case the “means of adaptation”
are ineffective and the theory of collapse is correct); or the “means of
adaptation” will really stop the collapse of the capitalist system and
thereby enable capitalism to maintain itself by suppressing its own
contradictions. In that case socialism ceases to be an historic
necessity. It then becomes anything you want to call it, but it is no
longer the result of the material development of society.

 The dilemma leads to another. Either revisionism is correct in its
position on the course of capitalist development, and therefore the
socialist transformation of society is only a utopia, or socialism is
not a utopia, and the theory of “means of adaptation” is false. There is
the question in a nutshell.



CHAPTER 2  THE ADAPTATION OF CAPITAL


 According to Bernstein, the credit system, the perfected means of
communication and the new capitalist combines are the important factors
that forward the adaptation of capitalist economy.

 Credit has diverse applications in capitalism. Its two most important
functions are to extend production and to facilitate exchange. When the
inner tendency of capitalist production to extend boundlessly strikes
against the restricted dimensions of private property, credit appears as
a means of surmounting these limits in a particular capitalist manner.
Credit, through shareholding, combines in one magnitude of capital a
large number of individual capitals. It makes available to each
capitalist the use of other capitalists’ money – in the form of
industrial credit. As commercial credit it accelerates the exchange of
commodities and therefore the return of capital into production, and
thus aids the entire cycle of the process of production. The manner in
which these two principle functions of credit influence the formation of
crises is quite obvious. If it is true that crises appear as a result of
the contradiction existing between the capacity of extension, the
tendency of production to increase, and the restricted consumption
capacity of the market, credit is precisely, in view of what was stated
above, the specific means that makes this contradiction break out as
often as possible. To begin with, it increases disproportionately the
capacity of the extension of production and thus constitutes an inner
motive force that is constantly pushing production to exceed the limits
of the market. But credit strikes from two sides. After having (as a
factor of the process of production) provoked overproduction, credit (as
a factor of exchange) destroys, during the crisis, the very productive
forces it itself created. At the first symptom of the crisis, credit
melts away. It abandons exchange where it would still be found
indispensable, and appearing instead, ineffective and useless, there
where some exchange still continues, it reduces to a minimum the
consumption capacity of the market.

 Besides having these two principal results, credit also influences the
formation of crises in the following ways. It constitutes the technical
means of making available to an entrepreneur the capital of other
owners. It stimulates at the same time the bold and unscrupulous
utilisation of the property of others. That is, it leads to speculation.
Credit not only aggravates the crisis in its capacity as a dissembled
means of exchange, it also helps to bring and extend the crisis by
transforming all exchange into an extremely complex and artificial
mechanism that, having a minimum of metallic money as a real base, is
easily disarranged at the slightest occasion.

 We see that credit, instead of being an instrument for the suppression
or the attenuation of crises, is on the contrary a particularly mighty
instrument for the formation of crises. It cannot be anything else.
Credit eliminates the remaining rigidity of capitalist relationships. It
introduces everywhere the greatest elasticity possible. It renders all
capitalist forces extensible, relative and mutually sensitive to the
highest degree. Doing this, it facilitates and aggravates crises, which
are nothing more or less than the periodic collisions of the
contradictory forces of capitalist economy.

 That leads us to another question. Why does credit generally have the
appearance of a “means of adaptation” of capitalism? No matter what the
relation or form in which this “adaptation” is represented by certain
people, it can obviously consist only of the power to suppress one of
the several antagonistic relations of capitalist economy, that is, of
the power to suppress or weaken one of these contradictions, and allow
liberty of movement, at one point or another, to the other fettered
productive forces. In fact, it is precisely credit that aggravates these
contradictions to the highest degree. It aggravates the antagonism
between the mode of production and the mode of exchange by stretching
production to the limit and at the same time paralysing exchange at the
smallest pretext. It aggravates the antagonism between the mode of
production and the mode of appropriation by separating production from
ownership, that is, by transforming the capital employed in production
into “social” capital and at the same time transforming a part of the
profit, in the form of interest on capital, into a simple title of
ownership. It aggravates the antagonism existing between the property
relations (ownership) and the relations of production by putting into a
small number of hands immense productive forces and expropriating large
numbers of small capitalists. Lastly, it aggravates the antagonism
existing between social character of production and private capitalist
ownership by rendering necessary the intervention of the State in
production.

 In short, credit reproduces all the fundamental antagonisms of the
capitalist world. It accentuates them. It precipitates their development
and thus pushes the capitalist world forward to its own destruction. The
prime act of capitalist adaptation, as far as credit is concerned,
should really consist in breaking and suppressing credit. In fact,
credit is far from being a means of capitalist adaptation. It is, on the
contrary, a means of destruction of the most extreme revolutionary
significance. Has not this revolutionary character of credit actually
inspired plans of “socialist” reform? As such, it has had some
distinguished proponents, some of whom (Isaac Pereira in France), were,
as Marx put it, half prophets, half rogues.

 Just as fragile is the second “means of adaptation”: employers’
organisations. According to Bernstein, such organisations will put an
end to anarchy of production and do away with crises through their
regulation of production. The multiple repercussions of the development
of cartels and trusts have not been considered too carefully up to now.
But they predict a problem that can only be solved with the aid of
Marxist theory.

 One thing is certain. We could speak of a damming up of capitalist
anarchy through the agency of capitalist combines only in the measure
that cartels, trusts, etc., become, even approximately, the dominant
form of production. But such a possibility is excluded by the very
nature of cartles. The final economic aim and result of combines is the
following. Through the suppression of competition in a given branch of
production, the distribution of the mass of profit realised on the
market is influenced in such a manner that there is an increase of the
share going to this branch of industry. Such organisation of the field
can increase the rate of profit in one branch of industry at the expense
of another. That is precisely why it cannot be generalised, for when it
is extended to all important branches of industry, this tendency
suppresses its own influence.

 Furthermore, within the limits of their practical application the
result of combines is the very opposite of suppression of industrial
anarchy. Cartels ordinarily succeed in obtaining an increase of profit,
in the home market, by producing at a lower rate of profit for the
foreign market, thus utilising the supplementary portions of capital
which they cannot utilise for domestic needs. That is to say, they sell
abroad cheaper than at home. The result is the sharpening of competition
abroad – the very opposite of what certain people want to find. That is
well demonstrated by the history of the world sugar industry.

 Generally speaking, combines treated as a manifestation of the
capitalist mode of production, can only be considered a definite phase
of capitalist development. Cartels are fundamentally nothing else than a
means resorted to by the capitalist mode of production for the purpose
of holding back the fatal fall of the rate of profit in certain branches
of production. What method do cartels employ for this end? That of
keeping inactive a part of the accumulated capital. That is, they use
the same method which in another form is employed in crises. The remedy
and the illness resemble each other like two drops of water. Indeed the
first can be considered the lesser evil only up to a certain point. When
the outlets of disposal begin to shrink, and the world market has been
extended to its limit and has become exhausted through the competition
of the capitalist countries – and sooner or later that is bound to come
– then the forced partial idleness of capital will reach such dimensions
that the remedy will become transformed into a malady, and capital,
already pretty much “socialised” through regulation, will tend to revert
again to the form of individual capital. In the face of the increased
difficulties of finding markets, each individual portion of capital will
prefer to take its chances alone. At that time, the large regulating
organisations will burst like soap bubbles and give way to aggravated
competition.

 In a general way, cartels, just like credit, appear therefore as a
determined phase of capitalist development, which in the last analysis
aggravates the anarchy of the capitalist world and expresses and ripens
its internal contradictions. Cartels aggravate the antagonism existing
between the mode of production and exchange by sharpening the struggle
between the producer and consumer, as is the case especially in the
United States. They aggravate, furthermore, the antagonism existing
between the mode of production and the mode of appropriation by
opposing, in the most brutal fashion, to the working class the superior
force of organised capital, and thus increasing the antagonism between
Capital and Labour.

 Finally, capitalist combinations aggravate the contradiction existing
between the international character of capitalist world economy and the
national character of the State – insofar as they are always accompanied
by a general tariff war, which sharpens the differences among the
capitalist States. We must add to this the decidedly revolutionary
influence exercised by cartels on the concentration of production,
technical progress, etc.

 In other words, when evaluated from the angle of their final effect on
capitalist economy, cartels and trusts fail as “means of adaptation.”
They fail to attenuate the contradictions of capitalism. On the
contrary, they appear to be an instrument of greater anarchy. They
encourage the further development of the internal contradictions of
capitalism. They accelerate the coming of a general decline of
capitalism.

 But if the credit system, cartels, and the rest do not suppress the
anarchy of capitalism, why have we not had a major commercial crisis for
two decades, since 1873? Is this not a sign that, contrary to Marx’s
analysis the capitalist mode of production has adapted itself – at
least, in a general way – to the needs of society? Hardly had Bernstein
rejected, in 1898, Marx’s theory of crises, when a profound general
crisis broke out in 1900, while seven years later, a new crisis
beginning in the United States, hit the world market. Facts proved the
theory of “adaptation” to be false. They showed at the same time that
the people who abandoned Marx’s theory of crisis only because no crisis
occurred within a certain space of time merely confused the essence of
this theory with one of its secondary exterior aspects – the ten-year
cycle. The description of the cycle of modern capitalist industry as a
ten-year period was to Marx and Engels, in 1860 and 1870, only a simple
statement of facts. It was not based on a natural law but on a series of
given historic circumstances that were connected with the rapidly
spreading activity of young capitalism.

 The crisis of 1825 was in effect, the result of extensive investment of
capital in the construction of roads, canals, gas works, which took
place during the preceding decade, particularly in England, where the
crisis broke out. The following crisis of 1836-1839 was similarly the
result of heavy investments in the construction of means of
transportation. The crisis of 1847 was provoked by the feverish building
of railroads in England (from 1844 to 1847, in three years, the British
Parliament gave railway concessions to the value of 15 billion dollars).
In each of the three mentioned cases, a crisis came after new bases for
capitalist development were established. In 1857, the same result was
brought by the abrupt opening of new markets for European industry in
America and Australia, after the discovery of the gold mines, and the
extensive construction of railway lines, especially in France, where the
example of England was then closely imitated. (From 1852 to 1856, new
railway lines to the value of 1,250 million francs were built in France
alone). And finally we have the great crisis of 1873 – a direct
consequence of the firm boom of large industry in Germany and Austria,
which followed the political events of 1866 and 1871.

 So that up to now, the sudden extension of the domain of capitalist
economy, and not its shrinking, was each time the cause of the
commercial crisis. That the international crisis repeated themselves
precisely every ten years was a purely exterior fact, a matter of
chance. The Marxist formula for crises as presented by Engels in
_Anti-Dühring_ and by Marx in the first and third volumes of _Capital_,
applies to all crises only in the measure that it uncovers their
international mechanism and their general basic causes.

 Crises may repeat themselves every five or ten years, or even every
eight or twenty years. But what proves best the falseness of Bernstein’s
theory is that it is in the countries having the greatest development of
the famous “means of adaptation” – credit, perfected communications and
trusts – that the last crisis (1907-1908) was most violent.

 The belief that capitalist production could “adapt” itself to exchange
presupposes one of two things: either the world market can spread
unlimitedly, or on the contrary the development of the productive forces
is so fettered that it cannot pass beyond the bounds of the market. The
first hypothesis constitutes a material impossibility. The second is
rendered just as impossible by the constant technical progress that
daily creates new productive forces in all branches.

 There remains still another phenomenon which, says Bernstein,
contradicts the course of capitalist development as it is indicated
above. In the “steadfast phalanx” of middle-size enterprises, Bernstein
sees a sign that the development of large industry does not move in a
revolutionary direction, and is not as effective from the angle of the
concentration of industry as was expected by the “theory” of collapse.
He is here, however, the victim of his own lack of understanding. For to
see the progressive disappearance of large industry is to misunderstand
sadly the nature of this process.

 According to Marxist theory, small capitalists play in the general
course of capitalist development the role of pioneers of technical
change. They possess that role in a double sense. They initiate new
methods of production in well-established branches of industry; they are
instrumental in the creation of new branches of production not yet
exploited by the big capitalist. It is false to imagine that the history
of the middle-size capitalist establishments proceeds rectilinearly in
the direction of their progressive disappearance. The course of this
development is on the contrary purely dialectical and moves constantly
among contradictions. The middle capitalist layers find themselves, just
like the workers, under the influence of two antagonistic tendencies,
one ascendant, the other descendant. In this case, the descendent
tendency is the continued rise of the scale of production, which
overflows periodically the dimensions of the average size parcels of
capital and removes them repeatedly from the terrain of world
competition.

 The ascendant tendency is, first, the periodic depreciation of the
existing capital, which lowers again, for a certain time, the scale of
production in proportion to the value of the necessary minimum amount of
capital. It is represented, besides, by the penetration of capitalist
production into new spheres. The struggle of the average size enterprise
against big Capital cannot be considered a regularly proceeding battle
in which the troops of the weaker party continue to melt away directly
and quantitatively. It should be rather regarded as a periodic mowing
down of the small enterprises, which rapidly grow up again, only to be
mowed down once more by large industry. The two tendencies play ball
with the middle capitalist layers. The descending tendency must win in
the end.

 The very opposite is true about the development of the working class.
The victory of the descending tendency must not necessarily show itself
in an absolute numerical diminution of the middle-size enterprises. It
must show itself, first in the progressive increase of the minimum
amount of capital necessary for the functioning of the enterprises in
the old branches of production; second in the constant diminution of the
interval of time during which the small capitalists conserve the
opportunity to exploit the new branches of production. The result as far
as the small capitalist is concerned, is a progressively shorter
duration of his stay in the new industry and a progressively more rapid
change in the methods of production as a field for investment. For the
average capitalist strata, taken as a whole, there is a process of more
and more rapid social assimilation and dissimilation.

 Bernstein knows this perfectly well. He himself comments on this. But
what he seems to forget is that this very thing is the law of the
movement of the average capitalist enterprise. If one admits that small
capitalists are pioneers of technical progress, and if it true that the
latter is the vital pulse of the capitalist economy, then it is manifest
that small capitalists are an integral part of capitalist development,
which can only disappear together with it [capitalist development]. The
progressive disappearance of the middle-size enterprise – in the
absolute sense considered by Bernstein – means not, as he things, the
revolutionary course of capitalist development, but precisely the
contrary, the cessation, the slowing up of development. “The rate of
profit, that is to say, the relative increase of capital,” said Marx,
“is important first of all for new investors of capital, grouping
themselves independently. And as soon as the formation of capital falls
exclusively into a handful of big capitalists, the revivifying fire of
production is extinguished. It dies away.”



CHAPTER 3  THE REALISATION OF SOCIALISM THROUGH SOCIAL REFORMS


 Bernstein rejects the “theory of collapse” as an historic road toward
socialism. Now what is the way to a socialist society that is proposed
by his “theory of adaptation to capitalism”? Bernstein answers this
question only by allusion. Konrad Schmidt, however, attempts to deal
with this detail in the manner of Bernstein. According to him, “the
trade union struggle for hours and wages and the political struggle for
reforms will lead to a progressively more extensive control over the
conditions of production,” and “as the rights of the capitalist
proprietor will be diminished through legislation, he will be reduced in
time to the role of a simple administrator.” “The capitalist will see
his property lose more and more value to himself” till finally “the
direction and administration of exploitation will be taken from him
entirely” and “collective exploitation” instituted.

 Therefore trade unions, social reforms and, adds Bernstein, the
political democratisation of the State are the means of the progressive
realisation of socialism.

 But the fact is that the principal function of trade unions (and this
was best explained by Bernstein himself in _Neue Zeit_ in 1891) consists
in providing the workers with a means of realising the capitalist law of
wages, that is to say, the sale of their labour power at current market
prices. Trade unions enable the proletariat to utilise at each instant,
the conjuncture of the market. But these conjunctures – (1) the labour
demand determined by the state of production, (2) the labour supply
created by the proletarianisation of the middle strata of society and
the natural reproduction of the working classes, and (3) the momentary
degree of productivity of labour – these remain outside of the sphere of
influence of the trade unions. Trade unions cannot suppress the law of
wages. Under the most favourable circumstances, the best they can do is
to impose on capitalist exploitation the “normal” limit of the moment.
They have not, however, the power to suppress exploitation itself, not
even gradually.

 Schmidt, it is true, sees the present trade union movement in a “feeble
initial stage.” He hopes that “in the future” the “trade union movement
will exercise a progressively increased influence over the regulation of
production.” But by the regulation of production we can only understand
two things: intervention in the technical domain of the process of
production and fixing the scale of production itself. What is the nature
of the influence exercised by trade unions in these two departments? It
is clear that in the technique of production, the interest of the
capitalist agrees, up to a certain point, with the progress and
development of capitalist economy. It is his own interest that pushes
him to make technical improvements. But the isolated worker finds
himself in a decidedly different position. Each technical transformation
contradicts his interests. It aggravates his helpless situation by
depreciating the value of his labour power and rendering his work more
intense, more monotonous and more difficult.

 Insofar as trade unions can intervene in the technical department of
production, they can only oppose technical innovation. But here they do
not act in the interest of the entire working class and its
emancipation, which accords rather with technical progress and,
therefore, with the interest of the isolated capitalist. They act here
in a reactionary direction. And in fact, we find efforts on the part of
workers to intervene in the technical part of production not in the
future, where Schmidt looks for it, but in the past of the trade union
movement. Such efforts characterised the old phase of English trade
unionism (up to 1860), when the British organisations were still tied to
medieval “corporative” vestiges and found inspiration in the outworn
principle of “a fair day’s wage for a fair day’s labour,” as expressed
by Webb in his _History of Trade Unionism_.

 On the other hand, the effort of the labour unions to fix the scale of
production and the prices of commodities is a recent phenomenon. Only
recently have we witnessed such attempts – and again in England. In
their nature and tendencies, these efforts resemble those dealt with
above. What does the active participation of trade unions in fixing the
scale and cost of production amount to? It amounts to a cartel of the
workers and entrepreneurs in a common stand against the consumer and
especially rival entrepreneurs. In no way is the effect of this any
different from that of ordinary employers’ associations. Basically we no
longer have here a struggle between Labour and Capital, but the
solidarity of Capital and Labour against the total consumers. Considered
for its social worth, it is seen to be a reactionary move that cannot be
a stage in the struggle for the emancipation of the proletariat, because
it connotes the very opposite of the class struggle. Considered from the
angle of practical application, it is found to be a utopia which, as
shown by a rapid examination, cannot be extended to the large branches
of industry producing for the world market.

 So that the scope of trade unions is limited essentially to a struggle
for an increase of wages and the reduction of labour time, that is to
say, to efforts at regulating capitalist exploitation as they are made
necessary by the momentary situation of the old world market. But labour
unions can in no way influence the process of production itself.
Moreover, trade union development moves – contrary to what is asserted
by Konrad Schmidt – in the direction of a complete detachment of the
labour market from any immediate relation to the rest of the market.

 That is shown by the fact that even attempts to relate labour contracts
to the general situation of production by means of a system of sliding
wage scales have been outmoded with historic development. The British
labour unions are moving farther and farther away from such efforts.

 Even within the effective boundaries of its activity the trade union
movement cannot spread in the unlimited way claimed for it by the theory
of adaptation. On the contrary, if we examine the large factors of
social development, we see that we are not moving toward an epoch marked
by a victorious development of trade unions, but rather toward a time
when the hardships of labour unions will increase. Once industrial
development has attained its highest possible pint and capitalism has
entered its descending phase on the world market, the trade union
struggle will become doubly difficult. In the first place, the objective
conjuncture of the market will be less favourable to the sellers of
labour power, because the demand for labour power will increase at a
slower rate and labour supply more rapidly than at present. In the
second place, the capitalists themselves, in order to make up for losses
suffered on the world market, will make even greater efforts than at
present to reduce the part of the total product going to the workers (in
the form of wages). The reduction of wages is, as pointed out by Marx,
one of the principal means of retarding the fall of profit. The
situation in England already offers us a picture of the beginning of the
second stage of trade union development. Trade union action is reduced
of necessity to the simple defence of already realised gains, and even
that is becoming more and more difficult. Such is the general trend of
things in our society. The counterpart of this tendency should be the
development of the political side of the class struggle.

 Konrad Schmidt commits the same error of historic perspective when he
deals with social reforms. He expects that social reforms, like trade
union organisations, will “dictate to the capitalists the only
conditions under which they will be able to employ labour power.” Seeing
reform in this light, Bernstein calls labour legislation a piece of
“social control,” and as such, a piece of socialism. Similarly, Konrad
Schmidt always uses the term “social control” when he refers to labour
protection laws. Once he has thus happily transformed the State into
society, he confidently adds: “That is to say, the rising working
class.” As a result of this trick of substitution, the innocent labour
laws enacted by the German Federal Council are transformed into
transitory socialist measures supposedly enacted by the German
proletariat.

 The mystification is obvious. We know that the present State is not
“society” representing the “rising working class.” It is itself the
representative of capitalist society. It is a class state. Therefore its
reform measures are not an application of “social control,” that is, the
control of society working freely in its own labour process. They are
forms of control applied by the class organisation of Capital to the
production of Capital. The so-called social reforms are enacted in the
interests of Capital. Yes, Bernstein and Konrad Schmidt see at present
only “feeble beginnings” of this control. They hope to see a long
succession of reforms in the future, all favouring the working class.
But here they commit a mistake similar to their belief in the unlimited
development of the trade union movement.

 A basic condition for the theory of the gradual realisation of
socialism through social reforms is a certain objective development of
capitalist property and of the State. Konrad Schmidt says that the
capitalist proprietor tends to lose his special rights with historic
development, and is reduced to the role of a simple administrator. He
thinks that the expropriation of the means of production cannot possibly
be effected as a single historic act. He therefore resorts to the theory
of expropriation by stages. With this in mind, he divides the right to
property into (1) the right of “sovereignty” (ownership) – which he
attributes to a thing called “society” and which he wants to extend –
and (2) its opposite, the simple right of use, held by the capitalist,
but which is supposedly being reduced in the hands of the capitalists to
the mere administration of their enterprises.

 This interpretation is either a simple play on words, and in that case
the theory of gradual expropriation has no real basis, or it is a true
picture of judicial development, in which case, as we shall see, the
theory of gradual expropriation is entirely false.

 The division of the right of property into several component rights, an
arrangement serving Konrad Schmidt as a shelter wherein he may construct
his theory of “expropriation by stages,” characterised feudal society,
founded on natural economy. In feudalism, the total product was shared
among the social classes of the time on the basis of the personal
relations existing between the feudal lord and his serfs or tenants. The
decomposition of property into several partial rights reflected the
manner of distribution of the social wealth of that period. With the
passage to the production of commodities and the dissolution of all
personal bonds among the participants in the process of production, the
relation between men and things (that is to say, private property)
became reciprocally stronger. Since the division is no longer made on
the basis of personal relations but through exchange, the different
rights to a share in the social wealth are no longer measured as
fragments of property rights having a common interest. They are measured
according to the values brought by each on the market.

 The first change introduced into juridical relations with the advance
of commodity production in the medieval city communes, was the
development of absolute private property. The latter appeared in the
very midst of the feudal juridical relations. This development has
progressed at a rapid pace in capitalist production. The more the
process of production is socialised, the more the process of
distribution (division of wealth) rests on exchange. And the more
private property becomes inviolable and closed, the more capitalist
property becomes transformed from the right to the product of one’s own
labour to the simple right to appropriate somebody else’s labour. As
long as the capitalist himself manages his own factory, distribution is
still, up to a certain point, tied to his personal participation in the
process of production. But as the personal management on the part of the
capitalist becomes superfluous – which is the case in the share-holding
societies today – the property of capital, so far as its right to share
in the distribution (division of wealth) is concerned, becomes separated
from any personal relation with production. It now appears in its purest
form. The capitalist right to property reaches its most complete
development in capital held in the shape of shares and industrial
credit.

 So that Konrad Schmidt’s historic schema, tracing the transformation of
the capitalist “from a proprietor to a simple administrator,” belies the
real historic development. In historic reality, on the contrary, the
capitalist tends to change from a proprietor and administrator to a
simple proprietor. What happens here to Konrad Schmidt, happened to
Goethe:

   What is, he sees as in a dream.

   What no longer is, becomes for him

   reality.

 Just as Schmidt’s historic schema travels, economically, backwards from
a modern share-holding society to an artisan’s shop, so, juridically, he
wishes to lead back the capitalist world into the old feudal shell of
the Middle Ages.

 Also from this point of view, “social control” appears in reality under
a different aspect than seen by Konrad Schmidt. What functions today as
“social control” – labour legislation, the control of industrial
organisations through share holding, etc. – has absolutely nothing to do
with his “supreme ownership.” Far from being, as Schmidt believes, a
reduction of capitalist ownership, his “social control,” is, on the
contrary, a protection of such ownership. Or, expressed from the
economic viewpoint, it is not a threat to capitalist exploitation, but
simply the regulation of exploitation. When Bernstein asks if there is
more or less of socialism in a labour protective law, we can assure him
that, in the best of labour protective laws, there is no more
“socialism” than in a municipal ordinance regulating the cleaning of
streets or the lighting of street lamps.



CHAPTER 4  CAPITALISM AND THE STATE


 The second condition of the gradual realisation of socialism is
according to Bernstein, the evolution of the State in society. It has
become a commonplace to say that the present State is a class State.
This, too, like referring to capitalist society, should not be
understood in a rigorous absolute manner, but dialectically.

 The State became capitalist with the political victory of the
bourgeoisie. Capitalist development modifies essentially the nature of
the State, widening its sphere of action, constantly imposing on it new
functions (especially those affecting economic life), making more and
more necessary its intervention and control in society. In this sense,
capitalist development prepares little by little the future fusion of
the State to society. It prepares, so to say, the return of the function
of the state to society. Following this line of thought, one can speak
of an evolution of the capitalist State into society, and it is
undoubtedly what Marx had in mind when he referred to labour legislation
as the first conscious intervention of “society” in the vital social
process, a phrase upon which Bernstein leans heavily.

 But on the other hand the same capitalist development realises another
transformation in the nature of the State. The present State is, first
of all, an organisation of the ruling class. It assumes functions
favouring social developments specifically because, and in the measure
that, these interests and social developments coincide, in a general
fashion, with the interests of the dominant class. Labour legislation is
enacted as much in the immediate interest of the capitalist class as in
the interest of society in general. But this harmony endures only up to
a certain point of capitalist development. When capitalist development
has reached a certain level, the interests of the bourgeoisie, as a
class, and the needs of economic progress begin to clash even in the
capitalist sense. We believe that this phase has already begun. It shows
itself in two extremely important phenomena of contemporary social life:
on the one hand, the policy of tariff barriers, and on the other,
militarism. These two phenomena have played an indispensable, and in
that sense a progressive and revolutionary role in the history of
capitalism. Without tariff protection the development of large industry
would have been impossible in several countries. But now the situation
is different.

 At present, protection does not serve so much to develop young industry
as to maintain artificially certain aged forms of production.

 From the angle of capitalist development, that is, from the point of
view of world economy, it matters little whether Germany exports more
merchandise into England or England exports more merchandise into
Germany. From the viewpoint of this development it may be said that the
blackamoor has done his work and it is time for him to go his way. Given
the condition of reciprocal dependence in which the various branches of
industry find themselves, a protectionist tariff on any commodity
necessarily results in raising the cost of production of other
commodities inside the country. It therefore impedes industrial
development. But this is not so from the viewpoint of the interests of
the capitalist class. While industry does not need tariff barriers for
its development, the entrepreneurs need tariffs to protect their
markets. This signifies that at present tariffs no longer serve as a
means of protecting a developing capitalist section against a more
advanced section. They are now the arm used by one national group of
capitalists against another group. Furthermore, tariffs are no longer
necessary as an instrument of protection for industry in its movement to
create and conquer the home market. They are now indispensable means for
the cartelisation of industry, that is, means used in the struggle of
capitalist producers against consuming society in the aggregate. What
brings out in an emphatic manner the specific character of contemporary
customs policies is the fact that today not industry, but agriculture
plays the predominant role in the making of tariffs. The policy of
customs protection has become a tool for converting and expressing the
feudal interests in capitalist form.

 The same change has taken place in militarism. If we consider history
as it was – not as it could have been or should have been – we must
agree that war has been an indispensable feature of capitalist
development. The United States, Germany, Italy, the Balkan States,
Poland, all owe the condition or the rise of their capitalist
development to wars, whether resulting in victory or defeat. As long as
there were countries marked by internal political division or economic
isolation which had to be destroyed, militarism played a revolutionary
role, considered from the viewpoint of capitalism. But at present the
situation is different. If world politics have become the stage of
menacing conflicts, it is not so much a question of the opening of new
countries to capitalism. It is a question of already existing _European_
antagonisms, which, transported into other lands, have exploded there.
The armed opponents we see today in Europe and on other continents do
not range themselves as capitalist countries on one side and backward
countries on the other. They are States pushed to war especially as a
result of their similarly advanced capitalist development. In view of
this, an explosion is certain to be fatal to this development, in the
sense that it must provoke an extremely profound disturbance and
transformation of economic life in all countries.

 However, the matter appears entirely different when considered from the
standpoint of the _capitalist class_. For the latter militarism has
become indispensable. First, as a means of struggle for the defence of
“national” interests in competition against other “national” groups.
Second, as a method of placement for financial and industrial capital.
Third, as an instrument of class domination over the labouring
population inside the country. In themselves, these interests have
nothing in common with the development of the capitalist mode of
production. What demonstrates best the specific character of present day
militarism is the fact that it develops generally in all countries as an
effect, so to speak, of its own internal, mechanical, motive power, a
phenomenon that was completely unknown several decades ago. We recognise
this in the fatal character of the impending explosion which is
inevitable in spite of the complete impending explosion which is
inevitable in spite of the complete indecisiveness of the objectives and
motives of the conflict. From a motor of capitalist development
militarism has changed into a capitalist malady.

 In the clash between capitalist development and the interest of the
dominant class, the State takes a position alongside of the latter. Its
policy, like that of the bourgeoisie, comes into conflict with social
development. It thus loses more and more of its character as a
representative of the whole of society and is transformed, at the same
rate into a pure _class_ state. Or, to speak more exactly, these two
qualities distinguish themselves more from each other and find
themselves in a contradictory relation in the very nature of the State.
This contradiction becomes progressively sharper. For on one hand, we
have the growth of the functions of a general interest on the part of
the State, its intervention in social life, its “control” over society.
But on the other hand, its class character obliges the State to move the
pivot of its activity and its means of coercion more and more into
domains which are useful only to the class character of the bourgeoisie
and have for society as a whole only a negative importance, as in the
case of militarism and tariff and colonial policies. Moreover, the
“social control” exercised by this State is at the same time penetrated
with and dominated by its class character (see how labour legislation is
applied in all countries).

 The extension of democracy, which Bernstein sees as a means of
realising socialism by degrees, does not contradict but, on the
contrary, corresponds perfectly to the transformation realised in the
nature of the State.

 Konrad Schmidt declares that the conquest of a social-democratic
majority in Parliament leads directly to the gradual “socialisation” of
society. Now, the democratic forms of political life are without a
question a phenomenon expressing clearly the evolution of the State in
society. They constitute, to that extent, a move toward a socialist
transformation. But the conflict within the capitalist State, described
above, manifests itself even more emphatically in modern
parliamentarism. Indeed, in accordance with its form, parliamentarism
serves to express, within the organisation of the State, the interests
of the whole society. But what parliamentarism expresses here is
capitalist society, that is to say, a society in which capitalist
interests predominate. In this society, the representative institutions,
democratic in form, are in content the instruments of the interests of
the ruling class. This manifests itself in a tangible fashion in the
fact that as soon as democracy shows the tendency to negate its class
character and become transformed into an instrument of the real
interests of the population, the democratic forms are sacrificed by the
bourgeoisie, and by its State representatives. That is why the idea of
the conquest of a parliamentary reformist majority is a calculation
which, entirely in the spirit of bourgeois liberalism, pre-occupies
itself only with one side – the formal side – of democracy, but does not
take into account the other side, its real content. All in all,
parliamentarism is not a directly socialist element impregnating
gradually the whole capitalist society. It is, on the contrary, a
specific form of the bourgeois class State, helping to ripen and develop
the existing antagonisms of capitalism.

 In the light of the history of the objective development of the State,
Bernstein’s and Konrad Schmidt’s belief that increased “social control”
results in the direct introduction of socialism is transformed into a
formula that finds itself from day to day in greater contradiction with
reality.

 The theory of the gradual introduction of socialism proposes
progressive reform of capitalist property and the capitalist State in
the direction of socialism. But in consequence of the objective laws of
existing society, one and the other develop in a precisely opposite
direction. The process of production is increasingly socialised, and
State intervention, the control of the State over the process of
production, is extended. But at the same time, private property becomes
more and more the form of open capitalist exploitation of the labour of
others, and State control is penetrated with the exclusive interests of
the ruling class. The State, that is to say the _political_ organisation
of capitalism, and the property relations, that is to say the
_juridical_ organisation of capitalism, become more _capitalist_ and not
more socialist, opposing to the theory of the progressive introduction
of socialism two insurmountable difficulties.

 Fourier’s scheme of changing, by means of a system of phalansteries,
the water of all the seas into tasty lemonade was surely a fantastic
idea. But Bernstein, proposing to change the sea of capitalist
bitterness into a sea of socialist sweetness, by progressively pouring
into it bottles of social reformist lemonade, presents an idea that is
merely more insipid but no less fantastic.

 The production relations of capitalist society approach more and more
the production relations of socialist society. But on the other hand,
its political and juridical relations established between capitalist
society and socialist society a steadily rising wall. This wall is not
overthrown, but is on the contrary strengthened and consolidated by the
development of social reforms and the course of democracy. Only the
hammer blow of revolution, that is to day, the _conquest of political
power by the proletariat can break down this wall._



CHAPTER 5  THE CONSEQUENCES OF SOCIAL REFORMISM AND GENERAL NATURE OF REFORMISM


 In the first chapter we aimed to show that Bernstein’s theory lifted
the program of the socialist movement off its material base and tried to
place it on an idealist base. How does this theory fare when translated
into practice?

 Upon the first comparison, the party practice resulting from
Bernstein’s theory does not seem to differ from the practice followed by
the Social Democracy up to now. Formerly, the activity of the
Social-Democratic Party consisted of trade union work, of agitation for
social reforms and the democratisation of existing political
institutions. The difference is not in the _what_, but in the _how_.

 At present, the trade union struggle and parliamentary practice are
considered to be the means of guiding and educating the proletariat in
preparation for the task of taking over power. From the revisionist
standpoint, this conquest of power is at the same time impossible or
useless. And therefore, trade union and parliamentary activity are to be
carried on by the party only for their immediate results, that is, for
the purpose of bettering the present situation of the workers, for the
gradual reduction of capitalist exploitation, for the extension of
social control.

 So that if we don not consider momentarily the immediate amelioration
of the workers’ condition – an objective common to our party program as
well as to revisionism – the difference between the two outlooks is, in
brief, the following. According to the present conception of the party,
trade-union and parliamentary activity are important for the socialist
movement because such activity prepares the proletariat, that is to say,
creates the _subjective_ factor of the socialist transformation, for the
task of realising socialism. But according to Bernstein, trade-unions
and parliamentary activity gradually reduce capitalist exploitation
itself. They remove from capitalist society its capitalist character.
They realise _objectively_ the desired social change.

 Examining the matter closely, we see that the two conceptions are
diametrically opposed. Viewing the situation from the current standpoint
of our party, we say that as a result of its trade union and
parliamentary struggles, the proletariat becomes convinced, of the
impossibility of accomplishing a fundamental social change through such
activity and arrives at the understanding that the conquest of power is
unavoidable. Bernstein’s theory, however, begins by declaring that this
conquest is impossible. It concludes by affirming that socialism can
only be introduced as a result of the trade-union struggle and
parliamentary activity. For as seen by Bernstein, trade union and
parliamentary action has a socialist character because it exercises a
progressively socialising influence on capitalist economy.

 We tried to show that this influence is purely imaginary. The relations
between capitalist property and the capitalist State develop in entirely
opposite directions, so that the daily practical activity of the present
Social Democracy loses, in the last analysis, all connection with work
for socialism. From the viewpoint of a movement for socialism, the
trade-union struggle and our parliamentary practice are vastly important
in so far as they make socialistic the _awareness_, the consciousness,
of the proletariat and help to organise it as a class. But once they are
considered as instruments of the direct socialisation of capitalist
economy, they lose out not only their usual effectiveness but also cease
being means of preparing the working class for the conquest of power.
Eduard Bernstein and Konrad Schmidt suffer from a complete
misunderstanding when they console themselves with the belief that even
though the program of the party is reduced to work for social reforms
and ordinary trade-union work, the final objective of the labour
movement is not thereby discarded, for each forward step reaches beyond
the given immediate aim and the socialist goal is implied as a tendency
in the supposed advance.

 That is certainly true about the present procedure of the German Social
Democracy. It is true whenever a firm and conscious effort for conquest
of political power impregnates the trade-union struggle and the work for
social reforms. But if this effort is separated from the movement itself
and social reforms are made an end in themselves, then such activity not
only does not lead to the final goal of socialism but moves in a
precisely opposite direction.

 Konrad Schmidt simply falls back on the idea that an apparently
mechanical movement, once started, cannot stop by itself, because “one’s
appetite grows with the eating,” and the working class will not
supposedly content itself with reforms till the final socialist
transformation is realised.

 Now the last mentioned condition is quite real. Its effectiveness is
guaranteed by the very insufficiency of capitalist reforms. But the
conclusion drawn from it could only be true if it were possible to
construct an unbroken chain of augmented reforms leading from the
capitalism of today to socialism. This is, of course, sheer fantasy. In
accordance with the nature of things as they are the chain breaks
quickly, and the paths that the supposed forward movement can take from
the point on are many and varied.

 What will be the immediate result should our party change its general
procedure to suit a viewpoint that wants to emphasise the practical
results of our struggle, that is social reforms? As soon as “immediate
results” become the principal aim of our activity, the clear-cut,
irreconcilable point of view, which has meaning only in so far as it
proposes to win power, will be found more and more inconvenient. The
direct consequence of this will be the adoption by the party of a
“policy of compensation,” a policy of political trading, and an attitude
of diffident, diplomatic conciliation. But this attitude cannot be
continued for a long time. Since the social reforms can only offer an
empty promise, the logical consequence of such a program must
necessarily be disillusionment.

 _It is not true that socialism will arise automatically from the daily
struggle of the working class. Socialism will be the consequence of (1),
the growing contradictions of capitalist economy and (2), of the
comprehension by the working class of the unavailability of the
suppression of these contradictions through a social transformation._
When, in the manner of revisionism, the first condition is denied and
the second rejected, the labour movement finds itself reduced to a
simple co-operative and reformist movement. We move here in a straight
line toward the total abandonment of the class viewpoint.

 This consequence also becomes evident when we investigate the general
character of revisionism. It is obvious that revisionism does not wish
to concede that its standpoint is that of the capitalist apologist. It
does not join the bourgeois economists in denying the existence of the
contradictions of capitalism. But, on the other hand, what precisely
constitutes the fundamental point of revisionism and distinguishes it
from the attitude taken by the Social Democracy up to now, is that it
does not base its theory on the belief that the contradictions of
capitalism will be suppressed as a result of the logical inner
development of the present economic system.

 We may say that the theory of revisionism occupies an intermediate
place between two extremes. Revisionism does not expect to see the
contradictions of capitalism mature. It does not propose to suppress
these contradictions through a revolutionary transformation. It wants to
lessen, to attenuate, the capitalist contradictions. So that the
antagonism existing between production and exchange is to be mollified
by the cessation of crises and the formation of capitalist combines. The
antagonism between Capital and Labour is to be adjusted by bettering the
situation of the workers and by the conservation of the middle classes.
And the contradiction between the class State and society is to be
liquidated through increased State control and the progress of
democracy.

 It is true that the present procedure of the Social Democracy does not
consist in waiting for the antagonisms of capitalism to develop and in
passing on, only then, to the task of suppressing them. On the contrary,
the essence of revolutionary procedure is to be guided by the direction
of this development, once it is ascertained, and inferring from this
direction what consequences are necessary for the political struggle.
Thus the Social Democracy has combated tariff wars and militarism
without waiting for their reactionary character to become fully evident.
Bernstein’s procedure is not guided by a consideration of the
development of capitalism, by the prospect of the aggravation of its
contradictions. It is guided by the prospect of the attenuation of these
contradictions. He shows this when he speaks of the “adaptation” of
capitalist economy.

 Now when can such a conception be correct? If it is true that
capitalism will continue to develop in the direction it takes at
present, then its contradictions must necessarily become sharper and
more aggravated instead of disappearing. The possibility of the
attenuation of the contradictions of capitalism presupposes that the
capitalist mode of production itself will stop its progress. In short,
the general condition of Bernstein’s theory is the cessation of
capitalist development.

 This way, however, his theory condemns itself in a twofold manner.

 In the first place, it manifests its _utopian_ character in its stand
on the establishment of socialism. For it is clear that a defective
capitalist development cannot lead to a socialist transformation.

 In the second place, Bernstein’s theory reveals its _reactionary_
character when it refers to the rapid capitalist development that is
taking place at present. Given the development of real capitalism, how
can we explain, or rather state, Bernstein’s position?

 We have demonstrated in the first chapter the baselessness of the
economic conditions on which Bernstein builds his analysis of existing
social relationships. We have seen that neither the credit system nor
cartels can be said to be “means of adaptation” of capitalist economy.
We have seen that not even the temporary cessation of crises nor the
survival of the middle class can be regarded as symptoms of capitalist
adaptation. But even though we should fail to take into account the
erroneous character of all these details of Bernstein’s theory we cannot
help but be stopped short by one feature common to all of them.
Bernstein’s theory does not seize these manifestations of contemporary
economic life as they appear in their organic relationship with the
whole of capitalist development, with the complete economic mechanism of
capitalism. His theory pulls these details out of their living economic
context. It treats them as _disjecta membra_ (separate parts) of a
lifeless machine.

 Consider, for example, his conception of the adaptive effect of credit.
If we recognise credit as a higher natural stage of the process of
exchange and, therefore, of the contradictions inherent in capitalist
exchange, we cannot at the same time see it as a mechanical means of
adaptation existing outside of the process of exchange. It would be just
as impossible to consider money, merchandise, and capital as “means of
adaptation” of capitalism.

 However, credit, like money, commodities and capital, is an organic
link of capitalist economy at a certain stage of its development. Like
them, it is an indispensable gear in the mechanism of capitalist
economy, and at the same time, an instrument of destruction, since it
aggravates the internal contradictions of capitalism.

 The same thing is true about cartels and the new, perfected means of
communication.

 The same mechanical view is presented by Bernstein’s attempt to
describe the promise of the cessation of crises as a symptom of the
“adaptation” of capitalist economy. For him, crises are simply
derangements of the economic mechanism. With their cessation, he thinks,
the mechanism could function well. But the fact is that crises are not
“derangements” in the usual sense of the word. They are “derangements”
without which capitalist economy could not develop at all. For if crises
constitute the only method possible in capitalism – and therefore the
normal method – of solving periodically the conflict existing between
the unlimited extension of production and the narrow limits of the world
market, then crises are an organic manifestation inseparable from
capitalist economy.

 In the “unhindered” advance of capitalist production lurks a threat to
capitalism that is much greater than crises. It is the threat of the
constant fall of the rate of profit, resulting not only from the
contradiction between production and exchange, but from the growth of
the productivity of labour itself. The fall in the rate of profit has
the extremely dangerous tendency of rendering impossible any enterprise
for small and middle-sized capitals. It thus limits the new formation
and therefore the extension of placements of capital.

 And it is precisely crises that constitute the other consequence of the
same process. As a result of their periodic _depreciation_ of capital,
crises bring a fall in the prices of means of production, a paralysis of
a part of the active capital, and in time the increase of profits. They
thus create the possibilities of the renewed advance of production.
Crises therefore appear to be the instruments of rekindling the fire of
capitalist development. Their cessation – not temporary cessation, but
their total disappearance in the world market – would not lead to the
further development of capitalist economy. It would destroy capitalism.

 True to the mechanical view of his theory of adaptation, Bernstein
forgets the necessity of crises as well as the necessity of new
placements of small and middle-sized capitals. And that is why the
constant reappearance of small capital seems to him to be the sign of
the cessation of capitalist development though it is, in fact, a symptom
of normal capitalist development.

 It is important to note that there is a viewpoint from which all the
above-mentioned phenomena are seen exactly as they have been presented
by the theory of “adaptation.” It is the viewpoint of the isolated
(single) capitalist who reflects in his mind the economic facts around
him just as they appear when refracted by the laws of competition. The
isolated capitalist sees each organic part of the whole of our economy
as an independent entity. He sees them as they act on him, the single
capitalist. He therefore considers these facts to be simple
“derangements” of simple “means of adaptation.” For the isolated
capitalist, it is true, crises are really simple derangements; the
cessation of crises accords him a longer existence. As far as he is
concerned, credit is only a means of “adapting” his insufficient
productive forces to the needs of the market. And it seems to him that
the cartel of which he becomes a member really suppresses industrial
anarchy.

 Revisionism is nothing else than a theoretic generalisation made from
the angle of the isolated capitalist. Where does this viewpoint belong
theoretically if not in vulgar bourgeois economics?

 All the errors of this school rest precisely on the conception that
mistakes the phenomena of competition, as seen from the angle of the
isolated capitalist, for the phenomena of the whole of capitalist
economy. Just as Bernstein considers credit to be a means of
“adaptation,” to the needs of exchange. Vulgar economy, too, tries to
find the antidote against the ills of capitalism in the phenomena of
capitalism. Like Bernstein, it believes that it is possible to regulate
capitalist economy. And in the manner of Bernstein, it arrives in time
at the desire to palliate the contradictions of capitalism, that is, at
the belief in the possibility of patching up the sores of capitalism. It
ends up by subscribing to a program of reaction. It ends up in an
utopia.

 The theory of revisionism can therefore be defined in the following
way. It is a theory of standing still in the socialist movement built,
with the aid of vulgar economy, on a theory of capitalist standstill.



 PART TWO



CHAPTER 6  ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND SOCIALISM


 The greatest conquest of the developing proletarian movement has been
the discovery of grounds of support for the realisation of socialism in
the _economic condition_ of capitalist society. As a result of this
discovery, socialism was changed from an “ideal” dreamt of by humanity
for thousands of years to a thing of _historic necessity_.

 Bernstein denies the existence of the economic conditions for socialism
in the society of today. On this count his reasoning has undergone an
interesting evolution. At first, in the _Neue Zeit_, he simply contested
the rapidity of the process of concentration taking place in industry.
He based his position on a comparison of the occupational statistics of
Germany in 1882 and 1895. In order to use these figures for his purpose,
he was obliged to proceed in an entirely summary and mechanical fashion.
In the most favourable case, he could not, even by demonstrating the
persistence of middle-sized enterprises, weaken in any the Marxian
analysis because the latter does not suppose as a condition for the
realisation of socialism either a definite rate of concentration of
industry – that is, a definite _delay_ of the realisation of socialism –
or, as we have already shown, the _absolute disappearance_ of small
capitals, usually described as the disappearance of the petit
bourgeoisie.

 In the course of the latest development of his ideas Bernstein
furnishes us, in his book, a new assortment of proofs: the statistics of
_shareholding societies_. These statistics are used in order to prove
that the number of shareholders increases constantly and as a result the
capitalist class does not become smaller but grows bigger. It is
surprising that Bernstein has so little acquaintance with his material.
And it is astonishing how poorly he utilises the existing data in his
own behalf.

 If he wanted to disprove the Marxian law of industrial development by
referring to the condition of shareholding societies, he should have
resorted to entirely different figures. Anybody who is acquainted with
the history of shareholding societies in Germany knows that their
average foundation capital has _diminished_ almost constantly. Thus
while before 1871 their average foundation capital reached the figure of
10.8 million marks, it was only 4.01 million marks in 1871, 3.8 million
marks in 1873, less than a million from 1882 to 1887, 0.52 million in
1891 and only 0.62 million in 1892. After this date the figures
oscillated around 1 million marks, falling to 1.78 in 1895 and to 1.19
in the course of the first half of 1897

1

 Van de Borght: _Handwörterbuch der Staatsswissenschaften_, 1

.

 Those are surprising figures. Using them, Bernstein hoped to show the
existence of a counter-Marxian tendency for retransformation of large
enterprises into small ones. The obvious answer to his attempt is the
following. If you are to prove anything at all by means of your
statistics, you must first show that they refer to the _same_ branches
of industry. You must not show that small enterprises really replace
large ones, that they do not. Instead, they appear only where small
enterprises or even artisan industry were the rule before. This,
however, you cannot show to be true. The statistical passage of immense
shareholding societies to middle-size and small enterprises can be
explained only by referring to the fact that the system of shareholding
societies continues to penetrate new branches of production. Before,
only a small number of large enterprises were organised as shareholding
societies. Gradually shareholding organisation has won middle-size and
even small enterprises. Today we can observe shareholding societies with
a capital of below 1,000 marks.

 Now, what is the economic significance of the extension of the system
of shareholding societies? Economically, the spread of shareholding
societies stands for the growing socialisation of production under the
capitalist form – socialisation not only of large but also of
middle-size and small production. The extension of shareholding does
not, therefore, contradict Marxist theory but on the contrary, confirms
it emphatically.

 What does the economic phenomenon of a shareholding society actually
amount to? It represents, on the one hand, the unification of a number
of small fortunes into a large capital of production. It stands, on the
other hand, for the separation of production from capitalist ownership.
That is, it denotes that a double victory being won over the capitalist
mode of production – but still on a capitalist base.

 What is the meaning, therefore, of the statistics cited by Bernstein
according to which an ever-greater number of shareholders participate in
capitalist enterprises? These statistics go on to demonstrate precisely
the following: at present a capitalist enterprise does not correspond,
as before, to a single proprietor of capital but to a number of
capitalists. Consequently, the economic notion of “capitalist” no longer
signifies an isolated individual. The industrial capitalist of today is
a collective person composed of hundreds and even of thousands of
individuals. The category “capitalist” has itself become a social
category. It has become “socialised” – within the frame-work of
capitalist society.

 In that case, how shall we explain Bernstein’s belief that the
phenomenon of share-holding societies stands for the dispersion and not
the concentration of capital? Why does he see the extension of
capitalist property where Marx saw its suppression?

 That is a simple economic error. By “capitalist,” Bernstein does not
mean a category of production but the right to property. To him,
“capitalist” is not an economic unit but a fiscal unit. And “capital” is
for him not a factor of production but simply a certain quantity of
money. That is why in his English sewing thread trust he does not see
the fusion of 12,300 persons with money into a single capitalist unit
but 12,300 different capitalists. That is why the engineer Schulze whose
wife’s dowry brought him a large number of share from stockholder
Mueller is also a capitalist for Bernstein. That is why for Bernstein
the entire world seems to swarm with capitalists.

 Here too, the theoretic base of his economic error is his
“popularisation” of socialism. For this is what he does. By transporting
the concept of capitalism from its productive relations to property
relations, and by speaking of simple individuals instead of speaking of
entrepreneurs, he moves the question of socialism from the domain of
production into the domain of relations of fortune – that is, from the
relation between Capital and Labour to the relation between poor and
rich.

 In this manner we are merrily led from Marx and Engels to the author of
_the Evangel of the Poor Fisherman_. There is this difference, however.
Weitling, with the sure instinct of the proletarian, saw in the
opposition between the poor and the rich, the class antagonisms in their
primitive form, and wanted to make of these antagonisms a lever of the
movement for socialism. Bernstein, on the other hand, locates the
realisation of socialism in the possibility of making the poor rich.
That is, he locates it in the attenuation of class antagonisms and
therefore in the petty bourgeoisie.

 True, Bernstein does not limit himself to the statistics of incomes. He
furnishes statistics of economic enterprises, especially those of the
following countries: Germany, France, England, Switzerland, Austria and
the United States. But these statistics are not the comparative figures
of _different periods_ in each country but of each period in different
countries. We are not therefore offered (with the exception of Germany
where he repeats the old contrast between 1895 and 1892), a comparison
of the statistics of enterprises of a given country at different epochs
but the absolute figures for different countries: England in 1891,
France in 1894, United States in 1890, etc.

 He reaches the following conclusion: “Though it is true that large
exploitation is already supreme in industry today, it nevertheless,
represents, including the enterprises dependent on large exploitation,
even in a country as developed in Prussia, only _half of the population
occupied in production_.” This is also true about Germany, England,
Belgium, etc.

 What does he actually prove here? He proves not the existence of such
or such a _tendency of economic development_ but merely the _absolute
relation of forces_ of different forms of enterprise, or put in other
words, the absolute relations of the various classes in our society.

 Now if one wants to prove in this manner the impossibility of realising
socialism one’s reasoning must rest on the theory according to which the
result of social efforts is decided by the relation of the numerical
material forces of the elements in the struggle, that is, by the factor
of _violence_. In other words, Bernstein, who always thunders against
Blanquism [See: Louis Blanqui], himself falls into the grossest
Blanquist error. There is this difference, however. To the Blanquists,
who represented a socialist and revolutionary tendency, the possibility
of the economic realisation of socialism appeared quite natural. On this
possibility they built the chances of a violent revolution – even by a
small minority. Bernstein, on the contrary, infers from the numerical
insufficiency of a socialist majority, the impossibility of the economic
realisation of socialism. The Social-Democracy does not, however, expect
to attain its aim either as a result of the victorious violence of a
minority or through the numerical superiority of a majority. It sees
socialism come as a result of economic necessity – and the comprehension
of that necessity – leading to the suppression of capitalism by the
working masses. And this necessity manifests itself above all in the
anarchy of capitalism.

 What is Bernstein’s position on the decisive question of anarchy in
capitalist economy? He denies only the great general crises. He does not
deny partial and national crises. In other words, he refuses to see a
great deal of the anarchy of capitalism; he sees only a little of it. He
is – to use Marx’s illustration – like the foolish virgin who had a
child “who was only very small.” But the misfortune is that in matters
like economic anarchy little and much are equally bad. If Bernstein
recognises the existence of a little of this anarchy, we may point out
to him that by the mechanism of the market economy this bit of anarchy
will be extended to unheard of proportions, to end in collapse. But if
Bernstein hopes to transform gradually his bit of anarchy into order and
harmony while maintaining the system of commodity production, he again
falls into one of the fundamental errors of bourgeois political economy
according to which the mode of exchange is independent of the mode of
production.

 This is not the place for a lengthy demonstration of Bernstein’s
surprising confusion concerning the most elementary principles of
political economy. But there is one point – to which we are led by the
fundamental questions of capitalist anarchy – that must be clarified
immediately.

 Bernstein declares that Marx’s law of surplus value is a simple
abstraction. In political economy a statement of this sort obviously
constitutes an insult. But if surplus value is only a simple
abstraction, if it is only a figment of the mind – then every normal
citizen who has done military duty and pays his taxes on time has the
same right as Karl Marx to fashion his individual absurdity, to make his
own law of value. “Marx has as much right to neglect the qualities of
commodities till they are no more than the incarnation of quantities of
simple human labour as have the economists of the Böhm-Jevons school to
make an abstraction of all the qualities of commodities outside of their
utility.”

 That is, to Bernstein, Marx’s social labour and Menger’s abstract
utility are quite similar – pure abstractions. Bernstein forgets
completely that Marx’s abstraction is not an invention. It is a
discovery. It does not exist in Marx’s head but in market economy. It
has not an imaginary existence, but a real social existence, so real
that it can be cut, hammered, weighed and put in the form of the money.
The abstract human labour discovered by Marx is, in its developed form,
no other than money. That is precisely one of the greatest of Marx’s
discoveries, while to all bourgeois political economists, from the first
of the mercantilists to the last of the classicists, the essence of
money has remained a mystic enigma.

 The Boehm-Jevons abstract utility is, in fact, a conceit of the mind.
Or stated more correctly, it is a representation of intellectual
emptiness, a private absurdity, for which neither capitalism nor any
other society can be made responsible, but only vulgar bourgeois economy
itself. Hugging their brain-child, Bernstein, Böhm and Jevons, and the
entire subjective fraternity, can remain twenty years or more before the
mystery of money, without arriving at a solution that is different from
the one reached by any cobbler, namely that money is also a “useful”
thing.

 Bernstein has lost all comprehension of Marx’s law of value. Anybody
with a small understanding of Marxian economics can see that without the
law of value, Marx’s doctrine is incomprehensible. Or to speak more
concretely – for him who does not understand the nature of the commodity
and its exchange the entire economy of capitalism, with all its
concatenations, must of necessity remain an enigma.

 What precisely was the key which enabled Marx to open the door to the
secrets of capitalist phenomena and solve, as if in play, problems that
were not even suspected by the greatest minds of classic bourgeois
economy? It was his conception of capitalist economy as an historic
phenomenon – not merely in the sense recognised in the best of cases by
the classic economists, that is, when it concerns the feudal past of
capitalism – but also in so far as it concerns the socialist future of
the world. The secret of Marx’s theory of value, of his analysis of the
problem of money, of his theory of capital, of the theory of the rate of
profit and consequently of the entire existing economic system is found
in the transitory character of capitalist economy, the inevitability of
its collapse leading – and this is only another aspect of the same
phenomenon – to socialism. It is only because Marx looked at capitalism
from the socialist’s viewpoint, that is from the historic viewpoint,
that he was enabled to decipher the hieroglyphics of capitalist economy.
And it is precisely because he took the socialist viewpoint as a point
of departure for his analysis of bourgeois society that he was in the
position to give a scientific base to the socialist movement.

 This is the measure by which we evaluate Bernstein’s remarks. He
complains of the “dualism” found everywhere in Marx’s monumental
_Capital_. “The work wishes to be a scientific study and prove, at the
same time, a thesis that was completely elaborated a long time before
the editing of the book; it is based on a schema that already contains
the result to which he wants to lead. The return to the _Communist
Manifesto_ (that is the socialist goal! – R.L.), proves the existence of
vestiges of utopianism in Marx’s doctrine.”

 But what is Marx’s “dualism” if not the dualism of the socialist future
and the capitalist present? It is the dualism of Capitalism and Labour,
the dualism of the bourgeoisie and the proletariat. It is the scientific
reflection of the dualism existing in bourgeois society, the dualism of
the class antagonism writhing inside the social order of capitalism.

 Bernstein’s recognition of this theoretic dualism in Marx as “a
survival of utopianism” is really his naïve avowal that he denies the
class antagonisms in capitalism. It is his confession that socialism has
become for him only a “survival of utopianism.” What is Bernstein’s
“monism” – Bernstein’s unity – but the eternal unity of the capitalist
regime, the unity of the former socialist who has renounced his aim and
has decided to find in bourgeois society, one and immutable, the goal of
human development?

 Bernstein does not see in the economic structure of capitalism the
development that leads to socialism. But in order to conserve his
socialist program, at least in form, he is obliged to take refuge in an
idealist construction placed outside of all economic development. He is
obliged to transform socialism itself from a definite historical phase
of social development into an abstract “principle.”

 That is why the “co-operative principle” – the meagre decantation of
socialism by which Bernstein wishes to garnish capitalist economy –
appears as a concession made not to the socialist future of society but
to Bernstein’s own socialist past.



CHAPTER 7  CO-OPERATIVES, UNIONS, DEMOCRACY


 Bernstein’s socialism offers to the workers the prospect of sharing in
the wealth of society. The poor are to become rich. How will this
socialism be brought about? His article in the _Neue Zeit_ ('Problems of
Socialism') contain only vague allusions to this question. Adequate
information, however, can be found in his book.

 Bernstein’s socialism is to be realised with the aid of these two
instruments: labour unions – or as Bernstein himself characterises them,
economic democracy – and co-operatives. The first will suppress
industrial profit; the second will do away with commercial profit.

 Co-operatives – especially co-operatives in the field of production
constitute a hybrid form in the midst of capitalism. They can be
described as small units of socialised production within capitalist
exchange.

 But in capitalist economy exchanges dominate production. As a result of
competition, the complete domination of the process of production by the
interests of capital – that is, pitiless exploitation – becomes a
condition for the survival of each enterprise. The domination of capital
over the process of production expresses itself in the following ways.
Labour is intensified. The work day is lengthened or shortened,
according to the situation of the market. And, depending on the
requirements of the market, labour is either employed or thrown back
into the street. In other words, use is made of all methods that enable
an enterprise to stand up against its competitors in the market. The
workers forming a co-operative in the field of production are thus faced
with the contradictory necessity of governing themselves with the utmost
absolutism. They are obliged to take toward themselves the role of
capitalist entrepreneur – a contradiction that accounts for the usual
failure of production co-operatives which either become pure capitalist
enterprises or, if the workers’ interests continue to predominate, end
by dissolving.

 Bernstein has himself taken note of these facts. But it is evident that
he has not understood them. For, together with Mrs. Potter-Webb, he
explains the failure of production co-operatives in England by their
lack of “discipline.” But what is so superficially and flatly called
here “discipline” is nothing else than the natural absolutist regime of
capitalism, which it is plain, the workers cannot successfully use
against themselves.

 Producers’ co-operatives can survive within capitalist economy only if
they manage to suppress, by means of some detour, the capitalist
controlled contradictions between the mode of production and the mode of
exchange. And they can accomplish this only by removing themselves
artificially from the influence of the laws of free competition. And
they can succeed in doing the last only when they assure themselves
beforehand of a constant circle of consumers, that is, when they assure
themselves of a constant market.

 It is the consumers’ co-operative that can offer this service to its
brother in the field of production. Here – and not in Oppenheimer’s
distinction between co-operatives that produce and co-operatives that
sell – is the secret sought by Bernstein: the explanation for the
invariable failure of producers’ co-operatives functioning independently
and their survival when they are backed by consumers’ organisations.

 If it is true that the possibilities of existence of producers’
co-operatives within capitalism are bound up with the possibilities of
existence of consumers’ co-operatives, then the scope of the former is
limited, in the most favourable of cases, to the small local market and
to the manufacture of articles serving immediate needs, especially food
products. Consumers’ and therefore producers’ co-operatives, are
excluded from the most important branches of capital production – the
textile, mining, metallurgical and petroleum industries, machine
construction, locomotive and ship-building. For this reason alone
(forgetting for the moment their hybrid character), co-operatives in the
field of production cannot be seriously considered as the instrument of
a general social transformation. The establishment of producers’
co-operatives on a wide scale would suppose, first of all, the
suppression of the world market, the breaking up of the present world
economy into small local spheres of production and exchange. The highly
developed, wide-spread capitalism of our time is expected to fall back
to the merchant economy of the Middle Ages.

 Within the framework of present society, producers’ co-operatives are
limited to the role of simple annexes to consumers’ co-operatives. It
appears, therefore, that the latter must be the beginning of the
proposed social change. But this way the expected reform of society by
means of co-operatives ceases to be an offensive against capitalist
production. That is, it ceases to be an attack against the principal
bases of capitalist economy. It becomes, instead, a struggle against
commercial capital, especially small and middle-sized commercial
capital. It becomes an attack made on the twigs of the capitalist tree.

 According to Bernstein, trade unions too, are a means of attack against
capitalism in the field of production. We have already shown that trade
unions cannot give the workers a determining influence over production.
Trade unions can determine neither the dimensions of production nor the
technical progress of production.

 This much may be said about the purely economic side of the “struggle
of the rate of wages against the rate of profit,” as Bernstein labels
the activity of the trade union. It does not take place in the blue of
the sky. It takes place within the well-defined framework of the law of
wages. The law of wages is not shattered but applied by trade-union
activity.

 According to Bernstein, it is the trade unions that lead – in the
general movement for the emancipation of the working class – the real
attack against the rate of industrial profit. According to Bernstein,
trade unions have the task of transforming the rate of industrial profit
into “rates of wages.” The fact is that trade unions are least able to
execute an economic offensive against profit. Trade unions are nothing
more than the organised _defence_ of labour power against the attacks of
profit. They express the resistance offered by the working class to the
oppression of capitalist economy.

 On the one hand, trade unions have the function of influencing the
situation in the labour-power market. But this influence is being
constantly overcome by the proletarianisation of the middle layers of
our society, a process which continually brings new merchandise on the
labour market. The second function of the trade unions is to ameliorate
the condition of the workers. That is, they attempt to increase the
share of the social wealth going to the working class. This share,
however, is being reduced with the fatality of a natural process by the
growth of the productivity of labour. One does not need to be a Marxist
to notice this. It suffices to read Rodbertus’ _In Explanation of the
Social Question_.

 In other words, the objective conditions of capitalist society
transform the two economic functions of the trade unions into a sort of
labour of Sisyphus

1

 The mythological king of Corinth who was condemned to roll a huge stone
to the top of a hill. It constantly rolled back down against making his
task incessant.

, which is, nevertheless, indispensable. For as a result of the activity
of his trade unions, the worker succeeds in obtaining for himself the
rate of wages due to him in accordance with the situation of the
labour-power market. As a result of trade union activity, the capitalist
law of wages is applied and the effect of the depressing tendency of
economic development is paralysed, or to be more exact, attenuated.

 However, the transformation of the trade union into an instrument for
the progressive reduction of profit in favour of wages presupposes the
following social conditions; first, the cessation of the
proletarianisation of the middle strata of our society; secondly, a
stoppage of the growth of productivity of labour. We have in both cases
a return to pre-capitalist conditions,

 Co-operatives and trade unions are totally incapable of transforming
the capitalist mode of production. This is really understood by
Bernstein, though in a confused manner. For he refers to co-operatives
and trade unions as a means of reducing the profit of the capitalists
and thus enriching the workers. In this way, he renounces the struggle
against the capitalist mode of production and attempts to direct the
socialist movement to struggle against “capitalist distribution.” Again
and again, Bernstein refers to socialism as an effort towards a “just,
juster and still more just” mode of distribution. (_Vorwärts_, March 26,
1899).

 It cannot be denied that the direct cause leading the popular masses
into the socialist movement is precisely the “unjust” mode of
distribution characteristic of capitalism. When the Social-Democracy
struggles for the socialisation of the entire economy, it aspires
therewith also to a “just” distribution of the social wealth. But,
guided by Marx’s observation that the mode of distribution of a given
epoch is a natural consequence of the mode of production of that epoch,
the Social-Democracy does not struggle against distribution in the
framework of capitalist production. It struggles instead for the
suppression of the capitalist production itself. In a word, the
Social-Democracy wants to establish the mode of socialist distribution
by suppressing the capitalist mode of production. Bernstein’s method, on
the contrary, proposes to combat the capitalist mode of distribution in
the hopes of gradually establishing, in this way, the socialist mode of
production.

 What, in that case, is the basis of Bernstein’s program for the reform
of society? Does it find support in definite tendencies of capitalist
production? No. In the first place, he denies such tendencies. In the
second place, the socialist transformation of production is for him the
effect and not the cause of distribution. He cannot give his program a
materialist base, because he has already overthrown the aims and the
means of the movement for socialism, and therefore its economic
conditions. As a result, he is obliged to construct himself an idealist
base.

 “Why represent socialism as the consequence of economic compulsion?” he
complains. “Why degrade man’s understanding, his feeling for justice,
his will?” (Vorwärts, March 26, 1899). Bernstein’s superlatively just
distribution is to be attained thanks to man’s free will; man’s will
acting not because of economic necessity, since this will is only an
instrument, but because of man’s comprehension of justice, because of
man’s idea of justice.

 We thus quite happily return to the principle of justice, to the old
war horse on which the reformers of the earth have rocked for ages, for
the lack of surer means of historic transportation. We return to the
lamentable Rosinate on which the Don Quixotes of history have galloped
towards the great reform of the earth, always to come home with their
eyes blackened.

 The relation of the poor to the rich, taken as a base for socialism,
the principle of co-operation as the content of socialism, the “most
just distribution” as its aim, and the idea of justice as its only
historic legitimisation – with how much more force, more with and more
fire did Weitling defend that sort of socialism fifty years ago.
However, that genius of a tailor did not know scientific socialism. If
today, the conception tore into bits by Marx and Engels a half century
ago is patched up and presented to the proletariat as the last world of
social science, that too, is the art of a tailor but it has nothing of a
genius about it.

 Trade unions and co-operatives are the economic support for the theory
of revisionism. Its principal political condition is the growth of
democracy. The present manifestations of political reaction are to
Bernstein only “displacement.” He considers them accidental, momentary,
and suggests that they are not to be considered in the elaboration of
the general directives of the labour movement.

 To Bernstein, democracy is an inevitable stage in the development of
society. To him, as to the bourgeois theoreticians of liberalism,
democracy is the great fundamental law of historic development, the
realisation of which is served by all the forces of political life.
However, Bernstein’s thesis is completely false. Presented in this
absolute force, it appears as a petty-bourgeois vulgarisation of results
of a very short phase of bourgeois development, the last twenty-five or
thirty years. We reach entirely different conclusions when we examine
the historic development of democracy a little closer and consider, at
the same time, the general political history of capitalism.

 Democracy has been found in the most dissimilar social formations: in
primitive communist groups, in the slave states of antiquity and in
medieval communes. And similarly, absolutism and constitutional monarchy
are to be found under the most varied economic orders. When capitalism
began, with the first production of commodities, it resorted to a
democratic constitution in the municipal-communes of the Middle Ages.
Later, when it developed to manufacturing, capitalism found its
corresponding political form in the absolute monarchy. Finally, as a
developed industrial economy, it brought into being in France the
democratic republic of 1793, the absolute monarchy of Napoleon I, the
nobles’ monarchy of the Restoration period (1850-1830), the bourgeois
constitutional monarchy of Louis-Philippe, then again the democratic
republic, and against the monarchy of Napoleon III, and finally, for the
third time, the Republic.

 In Germany, the only truly democratic institution – universal suffrage
– is not a conquest won by bourgeois liberalism. Universal suffrage in
Germany was an instrument for the fusion of the small States. It is only
in this sense that it has any importance for the development of the
German bourgeoisie, which is otherwise quite satisfied with semi-feudal
constitutional monarchy. In Russia, capitalism prospered for a long time
under the regime of oriental absolutism, without having the bourgeoisie
manifest the least desire in the world to introduce democracy. In
Austria, universal suffrage was above all a safety line thrown to a
foundering and decomposing monarchy. In Belgium, the conquest of
universal suffrage by the labour movement was undoubtedly due to the
weakness of the local militarism, and consequently to the special
geographic and political situation of the country. But we have here a
“bit of democracy” that has been won not by the bourgeoisie but against
it.

 The uninterrupted victory of democracy, which to our revisionism as
well as to bourgeois liberalism, appears as a great fundamental law of
human history and, especially, modern history is shown upon closer
examination to be a phantom. No absolute and general relation can be
constructed between capitalist development and democracy. The political
form of a given country is always the result of the composite of all the
existing political factors, domestic as well as foreign. It admits
within its limits all variations of the scale from absolute monarchy to
the democratic republic.

 We must abandon, therefore, all hope of establishing democracy as a
general law of historical development even within the framework of
modern society. Turning to the present phase of bourgeois society, we
observe here, too, political factors which, instead of assuring the
realisation of Bernstein’s schema, led rather to the abandonment by
bourgeois society of the democratic conquests won up to now.

 Democratic institutions – and this is of the greatest significance –
have completely exhausted their function as aids in the development of
bourgeois society. In so far as they were necessary to bring about the
fusion of small States and the creation of large modern States (Germany,
Italy), they are no longer indispensable at present. Economic
development has meanwhile effected an internal organic cicatrisation.

 The same thing can be said concerning the transformation of the entire
political and administrative State machinery from feudal or semi-feudal
mechanism to capitalist mechanism. While this transformation has been
historically inseparable from the development of democracy, it has been
realised today to such an extent that the purely democratic
“ingredients” of society, such as universal suffrage and the republican
State form, may be suppressed without having the administration, the
State finances, or the military organisation find it necessary to return
to the forms they had before the March Revolution

2

 The German revolution of 1848, which struck an effective blow against
the feudal institutions in Germany.

.

 If liberalism as such is now absolutely useless to bourgeois society it
has become, on the other hand, a direct impediment to capitalism from
other standpoints. Two factors dominate completely the political life of
contemporary States: world politics and the labour movement. Each is
only a different aspect of the present phase of capitalist development.

 As a result of the development of the world economy and the aggravation
and generalisation of competition on the world market, militarism and
the policy of big navies have become, as instruments of world politics,
a decisive factor in the interior as well as in the exterior life of the
great States. If it is true that world politics and militarism represent
a rising tendency in the present phase of capitalism, then bourgeois
democracy must logically move in a descending line.

 In Germany the era of great armament, began in 1893, and the policy of
world politics inaugurated with the seizure of Kiao-Cheou were paid for
immediately with the following sacrificial victim: the decomposition of
liberalism, the deflation of the Centre Party, which passed from
opposition to government. The recent elections to the Reichstag of 1907
unrolling under the sign of the German colonial policy were, at the same
time, the historical burial of German liberalism.

 If foreign politics push the bourgeoisie into the arms of reaction this
is no less true about domestic politics – thanks to the rise of the
working class. Bernstein shows that he recognises this when he makes the
social-democratic “legend,” which “wants to swallow everything” – in
other words, the socialist efforts of the working class – responsible
for the desertion of the liberal bourgeoisie. He advises the proletariat
to disavow its socialist aim so that the mortally frightened liberals
might come out of the mousehole of reaction. Making the suppression of
the socialist labour movement an essential condition for the
preservation of bourgeois democracy, he proves in a striking manner that
this democracy is in complete contradiction with the inner tendency of
development of the present society. He proves, at the same time, that
the socialist movement is itself a direct product of this tendency.

 But he proves, at the same time, still another thing. By making the
denouncement of the socialist aim an essential condition of the
resurrection of bourgeois democracy, he shows how inexact is the claim
that bourgeois democracy is an indispensable condition of the socialist
movement and the victory of socialism. Bernstein’s reasoning exhausts
itself in a vicious circle. His conclusion swallows his premises.

 The solution is quite simple. In view of that fact that bourgeois
liberalism has given up its ghost from fear of the growing labour
movement and its final aim, we conclude that the socialist labour
movement is today the only support for that which is not the goal of the
socialist movement – democracy. We must conclude that democracy can have
no support. We must conclude that the socialist movement is not bound to
bourgeois democracy but that, on the contrary, the fate of democracy is
bound up with the socialist movement. We must conclude from this that
democracy does not acquire greater chances of survival, as the socialist
movement becomes sufficiently strong to struggle against the reactionary
consequences of world politics and the bourgeois desertion of democracy.
He who would strengthen democracy should want to strengthen and not
weaken the socialist movement. He who renounces the struggle for
socialism renounces both the labour movement and democracy.



CHAPTER 8  CONQUEST OF POLITICAL POWER


 The fate of democracy is bound up, we have seen, with the fate of the
labour movement. But does the development of democracy render
superfluous or impossible a proletarian revolution, that is, the
conquest of political power by the workers?

 Bernstein settles the question by weighing minutely the good and bad
sides of social reform and social revolution. He does it almost in the
same manner in which cinnamon or pepper is weighed out in a consumers’
co-operative store. He sees the legislative course of historic
development as the action of “intelligence,” while the revolutionary
course of historic development is for him the action of “feeling.”
Reformist activity, he recognises as a slow method of historic progress,
revolution as a rapid method of progress. In legislation he sees a
methodical force; in revolution, a spontaneous force.

 We have known for a long time that the petty-bourgeoisie reformer finds
“good” and “bad” sides in everything. He nibbles a bit at all grasses.
But the real course of events is little affected by such combination.
The carefully gathered little pile of the “good sides” of all things
possible collapses at the first filip of history. Historically,
legislative reform and the revolutionary method function in accordance
with influences that are much more profound than the consideration of
the advantages or inconveniences of one method or another.

 In the history of bourgeois society, legislative reform served to
strengthen progressively the rising class till the latter was
sufficiently strong to seize political power, to suppress the existing
juridical system and to construct itself a new one. Bernstein,
thundering against the conquest of political power as a theory of
Blanquist violence, has the misfortune of labelling as a Blanquist error
that which has always been the pivot and the motive force of human
history. From the first appearance of class societies having the class
struggle as the essential content of their history, the conquest of
political power has been the aim of all rising classes. Here is the
starting point and end of every historic period. This can be seen in the
long struggle of the Latin peasantry against the financiers and nobility
of ancient Rome, in the struggle of the medieval nobility against the
bishops and in the struggle of the artisans against the nobles, in the
cities of the Middle Ages. In modern times, we see it in the struggle of
the bourgeoisie against feudalism.

 Legislative reform and revolution are not different methods of historic
development that can be picked out at the pleasure from the counter of
history, just as one chooses hot or cold sausages. Legislative reform
and revolution are different factors in the development of class
society. They condition and complement each other, and are at the same
time reciprocally exclusive, as are the north and south poles, the
bourgeoisie and proletariat.

 Every legal constitution is the product of a revolution. In the history
of classes, revolution is the act of political creation, while
legislation is the political expression of the life of a society that
has already come into being. Work for reform does not contain its own
force independent from revolution. During every historic period, work
for reforms is carried on only in the direction given to it by the
impetus of the last revolution and continues as long as the impulsion
from the last revolution continues to make itself felt. Or, to put it
more concretely, in each historic period work for reforms is carried on
only in the framework of the social form created by the last revolution.
Here is the kernel of the problem.

 It is contrary to history to represent work for reforms as a long-drawn
out revolution and revolution as a condensed series of reforms. A social
transformation and a legislative reform do not differ according to their
duration but according to their content. The secret of historic change
through the utilisation of political power resides precisely in the
transformation of simple quantitative modification into a new quality,
or to speak more concretely, in the passage of an historic period from
one given form of society to another.

 That is why people who pronounce themselves in favour of the method of
legislative reform in place and in contradistinction to the conquest of
political power and social revolution, do not really choose a more
tranquil, calmer and slower road to the same goal, but a different goal.
Instead of taking a stand for the establishment of a new society they
take a stand for surface modifications of the old society. If we follow
the political conceptions of revisionism, we arrive at the same
conclusion that is reached when we follow the economic theories of
revisionism. Our program becomes not the realisation of socialism, but
the reform of capitalism; not the suppression of the wage labour system
but the diminution of exploitation, that is, the suppression of the
abuses of capitalism instead of suppression of capitalism itself.

 Does the reciprocal role of legislative reform and revolution apply
only to the class struggle of the past? It is possible that now, as a
result of the development of the bourgeois juridical system, the
function of moving society from one historic phase to another belongs to
legislative reform and that the conquest of State power by the
proletariat has really become “an empty phrase,” as Bernstein puts it?

 The very opposite is true. What distinguishes bourgeois society from
other class societies – from ancient society and from the social order
of the Middle Ages? Precisely the fact that class domination does not
rest on “acquired rights” but on real economic relations – the fact that
wage labour is not a juridical relation, but purely an economic
relation. In our juridical system there is not a single legal formula
for the class domination of today. The few remaining traces of such
formulae of class domination are (as that concerning servants),
survivals of feudal society.

 How can wage slavery be suppressed the “legislative way,” if wage
slavery is not expressed the laws? Bernstein, who would do away with
capitalism by means of legislative reforms, finds himself in the same
situation s Uspensky’s Russian policeman who said: “Quickly I seized the
rascal by the collar! But what do I see? The confounded fellow has no
collar!” And that is precisely Bernstein’s difficulty.

 “All previous societies were based on an antagonism between an
oppressing class and an oppressed class” (_Communist Manifesto_). But in
the preceding phases of modern society, this antagonism was expressed in
distinctly determined juridical relations and could, especially because
of that, accord, to a certain extent, a place to new relations within
the framework of the old. “In the midst of serfdom, the serf raised
himself to the rank of a member of the town community” (_Communist
Manifesto_). How was that made possible? It was made possible by the
progressive of all feudal privileges in the environs of the city: the
corvée, the right to special dress, the inheritance tax, the lord’s
claim to the best cattle, the personal levy, marriage under duress, the
right to succession, etc., which all together constituted serfdom.

 In the same way, the small bourgeoisie of the Middle Ages succeeded in
raising itself, while it was still under the yoke of feudal absolutism,
to the rank of bourgeoisie (_Communist Manifesto_). By what means? By
means of the formal partial suppression or complete loosening of the
corporative bonds, by the progressive transformation of the fiscal
administration and of the army.

 Consequently, when we consider the question from the abstract
viewpoint, not from the historic viewpoint, we can imagine (in view of
the former class relations) a legal passage, according to the reformist
method, from feudal society to bourgeois society. But what do we see in
reality? In reality, we see that legal reforms not only do not obviate
the seizure of political power by the bourgeoisie but have, on the
contrary, prepared for it and led to it. A formal social-political
transformation was indispensable for the abolition of slavery as well as
for the complete suppression of feudalism.

 But the situation is entirely different now. No law obliges the
proletariat to submit itself to the yoke of capitalism. Poverty, the
lack of means of production, obliges the proletariat to submit itself to
the yoke of capitalism. And no law in the world can give to the
proletariat the means of production while it remains in the framework of
bourgeois society, for not laws but economic development have torn the
means of production from the producers’ possession.

 And neither is the exploitation inside the system of wage labour based
on laws. The level of wages is not fixed by legislation but by economic
factors. The phenomenon of capitalist exploitation does not rest on a
legal disposition but on the purely economic fact that labour power
plays in this exploitation the role of a merchandise possessing, among
other characteristics, the agreeable quality of producing value – more
than the value it consumes in the form of the labourer’s means of
subsistence. In short, the fundamental relations of the domination of
the capitalist class cannot be transformed by means of legislative
reforms, on the basis of capitalist society, because these relations
have not been introduced by bourgeois laws, nor have they received the
form of such laws. Apparently, Bernstein is not aware of this for he
speaks of “socialist reforms.” On the other hand, he seems to express
implicit recognition of this when he writes, on page 10 of his book,
“the economic motive acts freely today, while formerly it was masked by
all kinds of relations of domination by all sorts of ideology.”

 It is one of the peculiarities of the capitalist order that within it
all the elements of the future society first assume, in their
development, a form not approaching socialism but, on the contrary, a
form moving more and more away from socialism. Production takes on a
progressively increasing social character. But under what form is the
social character of capitalist production expressed? It is expressed in
the form of the large enterprise, in the form of the shareholding
concern, the cartel, within which the capitalist antagonisms, capitalist
exploitation, the oppression of labour-power, are augmented to the
extreme.

 In the army, capitalist development leads to the extension of
obligatory military service to the reduction of the time of service and
consequently to a material approach to a popular militia. But all of
this takes place under the form of modern militarism in which the
domination of the people by the militarist State and the class character
of the State manifest themselves most clearly.

 In the field of political relations, the development of democracy
brings – in the measure that it finds a favourable soil – the
participation of all popular strata in political life and, consequently,
some sort of “people’s State.” But this participation takes the form of
bourgeois parliamentarism, in which class antagonisms and class
domination are not done away with, but are, on the contrary, displayed
in the open. Exactly because capitalist development moves through these
contradictions, it is necessary to extract the kernel of socialist
society from its capitalist shell. Exactly for this reason must the
proletariat seize political power and suppress completely the capitalist
system.

 Of course, Bernstein draws other conclusions. If the development of
democracy leads to the aggravation and not to the lessening of
capitalist antagonisms, “the Social-Democracy,” he answers us, “in order
not to render its task more difficult, must by all means try to stop
social reforms and the extension of democratic institutions,” (page 71).
Indeed, that would be the right thing to do if the Social-Democracy
found to its taste, in the petty-bourgeois manner, the futile task of
picking for itself all the good sides of history and rejecting the bad
sides of history. However, in that case, it should at the same time “try
to stop” capitalism in general, for there is not doubt that latter is
the rascal placing all these obstacles in the way of socialism. But
capitalism furnishes besides the obstacles also the only possibilities
of realising the socialist programme. The same can be said about
democracy.

 If democracy has become superfluous or annoying to the bourgeoisie, it
is on the contrary necessary and indispensable to the working class. It
is necessary to the working class because it creates the political forms
(autonomous administration, electoral rights, etc.) which will serve the
proletariat as fulcrums in its task of transforming bourgeois society.
Democracy is indispensable to the working class because only through the
exercise of its democratic rights, in the struggle for democracy, can
the proletariat become aware of its class interests and its historic
task.

 In a word, democracy is indispensable not because it renders
superfluous the conquest of political power by the proletariat but
because it renders this conquest of power both necessary and possible.
When Engels, in his preface to the _Class Struggles in France_, revised
the tactics of the modern labour movement and urged the legal struggle
as opposed to the barricades, he did not have in mind – this comes out
of every line of the preface – the question of a definite conquest of
political power, but the contemporary daily struggle. He did not have in
mind the attitude that the proletariat must take toward the capitalist
State at the time of the seizure of power but the attitude of the
proletariat while in the bounds of the capitalist State. Engels was
giving directions to the proletariat oppressed, and not to the
proletariat victorious.

 On the other hand, Marx’s well known sentence on the agrarian question
in England (Bernstein leans on it heavily), in which he says: “We shall
probably succeed easier by buying the estates of the landlords,” does
not refer to the stand of the proletariat before, but after its victory.
For there evidently can be a question of buying the property of the old
dominant class only when the workers are in power. The possibility
envisaged by Marx is that of the pacific exercise of the dictatorship of
the proletariat and not the replacement of the dictatorship with
capitalist social reforms. There was no doubt for Marx and Engels about
the necessity of having the proletariat conquer political power. It is
left to Bernstein to consider the poultry-yard of bourgeois
parliamentarism as the organ by means of which we are to realise the
most formidable social transformation of history, the passage from
capitalist society to socialism.

 Bernstein introduces his theory by warning the proletariat against the
danger of acquiring power too early. That is, according to Bernstein,
the proletariat ought to leave the bourgeois society in its present
condition and itself suffer a frightful defeat. If the proletariat came
to power, it could draw from Bernstein’s theory the following
“practical” conclusion: to go to sleep. His theory condemns the
proletariat at the most decisive moments of the struggle, to inactivity,
to a passive betrayal of its own cause.

 Our programme would be a miserable scrap of paper if it could not serve
us in all eventualities, at all moments of the struggle and if it did
not serve us by its application and not by its non-application. If our
programme contains the formula of the historical development of society
from capitalism to socialism, it must also formulate, in all its
characteristic fundamentals, all the transitory phases of this
development and it should, consequently, be able to indicate to the
proletariat what ought to be its corresponding action at every moment on
the road toward socialism. There can be no time for the proletariat when
it will be obliged to abandon its programme or be abandoned by it.

 Practically, this is manifested in the fact that there can be no time
when the proletariat, placed in power by the force of events, is not in
the condition or is not morally obliged to take certain measures for the
realisation of its programme, that is, take transitory measures in the
direction of socialism. Behind the belief that the socialist programme
can collapse completely at any point of the dictatorship of the
proletariat lurks the other belief that the socialist programme is
generally and at all times, unrealisable.

 And what if the transitory measures are premature? The question hides a
great number of mistaken ideas concerning the real course of a social
transformation.

 In the first place, the seizure of political power by the proletariat,
that is to say by a large popular class, is not produced artificially.
It presupposes (with the exception of such cases as the Paris Commune,
when the proletariat did not obtain power after a conscious struggle for
its goal but fell into its hands like a good thing abandoned by
everybody else) a definite degree of maturity of economic and political
relations. Here we have the essential difference between coups d’etat
along Blanqui’s conception which are accomplished by an “active
minority” and burst out like pistol shot, always inopportunely, and the
conquest of political power by a great conscious popular mass which can
only be the product of the decomposition of bourgeois society and
therefore bears in itself the economic and political legitimisation of
its opportune appearance.

 If, therefore, considered from the angle of political effect the
conquest of political power by the working class cannot materialise
itself “too early” then from the angle of conservation of power, the
premature revolution, the thought of which keeps Bernstein awake,
menaces us like a sword of Damocles. Against that neither prayers nor
supplication, neither scares nor any amount of anguish, are of any
avail. And this for two very simple reasons.

 In the first place, it is impossible to imagine that a transformation
as formidable as the passage from capitalist society to socialist
society can be realised in one happy act. To consider that as possible
is, again, to lend colour to conceptions that are clearly Blanquist. The
socialist transformation supposes a long and stubborn struggle, in the
course of which, it is quite probable the proletariat will be repulsed
more than once so that for the first time, from the viewpoint of the
final outcome of the struggle, it will have necessarily come to power
“too early.”

 In the second place, it will be impossible to avoid the “premature”
conquest of State power by the proletariat precisely because these
“premature” attacks of the proletariat constitute a factor and indeed a
very important factor, creating the political conditions of the final
victory. In the course of the political crisis accompanying its seizure
of power, in the course of the long and stubborn struggles, the
proletariat will acquire the degree of political maturity permitting it
to obtain in time a definitive victory of the revolution. Thus these
“premature” attacks of the proletariat against the State power are in
themselves important historic factors helping to provoke and determine
the point of the definite victory. Considered from this viewpoint, the
idea of a “premature” conquest of political power by the labouring class
appears to be a polemic absurdity derived from a mechanical conception
of the development of society, and positing for the victory of the class
struggle a point fixed outside and independent of the class struggle.

 Since the proletariat is not in the position to seize power in any
other way than “prematurely,” since the proletariat is absolutely
obliged to seize power once or several times “too early” before it can
maintain itself in power for good, the objection to the “premature”
conquest of power is at bottom nothing more than a general opposition to
the aspiration of the proletariat to possess itself of State power. Just
as all roads lead to Rome so too do we logically arrive at the
conclusion that the revisionist proposal to slight the final aim of the
socialist movement is really a recommendation to renounce the socialist
movement itself.



CHAPTER 9  COLLAPSE


 Bernstein began his revision of the Social-Democracy by abandoning the
theory of capitalist collapse. The latter, however, is the corner-stone
of scientific socialism. By rejecting it Bernstein also rejects the
whole doctrine of socialism. In the course of his discussion, he
abandons one after another of the positions of socialism in order to be
able to maintain his first affirmation.

 Without the collapse of capitalism the expropriation of the capitalist
class is impossible. Bernstein therefore renounces expropriation and
chooses a progressive realisation of the “co-operative principle” as the
aim of the labour movement.

 But co-operation cannot be realised without capitalist production.
Bernstein, therefore, renounces the socialisation of production and
merely proposes to reform commerce and to develop consumers’
co-operatives.

 But the transformation of society through consumers’ co-operatives,
even by means of trade unions, is incompatible with the real material
development of capitalist society. Therefore, Bernstein abandons the
materialist conception of history.

 But his conception of the march of economic development is incompatible
with the Marxist theory of surplus-value. Therefore, Bernstein abandons
the theory of value and surplus-value and, in this way, the whole
economic system of Karl Marx.

 But the struggle of the proletariat cannot be carried on without a
given final aim and without an economic base found in the existing
society. Bernstein, therefore, abandons the class struggle and speaks of
reconciliation with bourgeois liberalism.

 But in a class society, the class struggle is a natural and unavoidable
phenomenon. Bernstein, therefore, contests even the existence of classes
in society. The working class is for him a mass of individuals, divided
politically and intellectually but also economically. And the
bourgeoisie, according to him, does not group itself politically in
accordance with its inner economic interest but only because of exterior
pressure from above and below.

 But if there is no economic base for the class struggle and, if
consequently, there are no classes in our society, not only the future
but even the past struggles of the proletariat against the bourgeoisie
appear to be impossible and the Social-Democracy and its successes seem
absolutely incomprehensible or they can be understood only as the
results of political pressure by the government – that is, not as the
natural consequence of historic development but as the fortuitous
consequences of the policy of the Hohenzollern not as the legitimate
offspring of capitalist society but as the legitimate offspring of
capitalist society but as the bastard children of reaction. Rigorously
logical, in this respect, Bernstein passes from the materialist
conception of history to the outlook of the _Frankfurter Zeitung_ and
the _Vossische Zeitung_.

 After rejecting the socialist criticism of capitalist society, it is
easy for Bernstein to find the present state of affairs satisfactory –
at least in a general way. Bernstein does not hesitate. He discovers
that at the present time reaction is not very strong in Germany, that
“we cannot speak of political reaction in the countries of western
Europe,” and that in all the countries of the West “the attitude of the
bourgeois classes toward the socialist movement is at most an attitude
of defence and not one of oppression,” (_Vorwärts_, March 26, 1899). Far
from becoming worse, the situation of the workers is getting better.
Indeed, the bourgeoisie is politically progressive and morally sane. We
cannot speak either of reaction or oppression. It is all for the best in
the best of all possible worlds…

 Bernstein thus travels in logical sequence from A to Z. He began by
abandoning the final aim and supposedly keeping the movement. But as
there can be no socialist movement without a socialist aim he ends by
renouncing the movement.

 And thus the Bernstein’s conception of socialism collapses entirely.
The proud and admirable symmetric construction of socialist thought
becomes for him a pile of rubbish in which the debris of all systems,
the pieces of thought of various great and small minds, find a common
resting place. Marx and Proudhon, Leon von Buch and Franz Oppenheimer,
Friedrich Albert Lange and Kant, Herr Prokopovich and R. Ritter von
Neupauer, Herkner, and Schulze-Gävernitz, Lassalle and Professor Julius
Wolff: all contribute something to Bernstein’s system. From each he
takes a little. There is nothing astonishing about that. For when he
abandoned scientific socialism he lost the axis of intellectual
crystallisation around which isolated facts group themselves in the
organic whole of a coherent conception of the world.

 His doctrine, composed of bits of all possible systems, seems upon
first consideration to be completely free from prejudices. For Bernstein
does not like talk of “party science,” or to be more exact, of class
science, any more than he likes to talk of class liberalism or class
morality. He thinks he succeeds in expressing human, general, abstract
science, abstract liberalism, abstract morality. But since the society
of reality is made up of classes which have diametrically opposed
interests, aspirations and conceptions, a general human science in
social questions, an abstract liberalism, an abstract morality, are at
present illusions, pure utopia. The science, the democracy, the
morality, considered by Bernstein as general, human, are merely the
dominant science, dominant democracy and dominant morality that is,
bourgeois science, bourgeois democracy, bourgeois morality.

 When Bernstein rejects the economic doctrine of Marx in order to swear
by the teachings of Bretano, Böhm-Bawerk, Jevons, Say and Julius Wolff,
he exchanges the scientific base of the emancipation of the working
class for the apologetics of the bourgeoisie. When he speaks of the
generally human character of liberalism and transforms socialism into a
variety of liberalism, he deprives the socialist movement (generally) of
its class character and consequently of its historic content,
consequently of all content; and conversely, recognises the class
representing liberalism in history, the bourgeoisie, as the champion of
the general interests of humanity.

 And when he wars against “raising of the material factors to the rank
of an all-powerful force of development,” when he protests against the
so-called “contempt for the ideal” that is supposed to rule the
Social-Democracy, when he presumes to talk for idealism, for morals,
pronouncing himself at the same time against the only source of the
moral rebirth of the proletariat, a revolutionary class struggle – he
does no more than the following: preach to the working class the
quintessence of the morality of the bourgeoisie, that is, reconciliation
with the existing social order and the transfer of the hopes of the
proletariat to the limbo of ethical simulacra.

 When he directs his keenest arrows against our dialectic system, he is
really attacking the specific mode of thought employed by the conscious
proletariat in its struggle for liberation. It is an attempt to break
the sword that has helped the proletariat to pierce the darkness of its
future. It is an attempt to shatter the intellectual arm with the aid of
which the proletariat, though materially under the yoke of the
bourgeoisie, is yet enabled to triumph over the bourgeoisie. For it is
our dialectical system that shows to the working class the transitory
nature of this yoke, proving to workers the inevitability of their
victory and is already realising a revolution in the domain of thought.
Saying good-bye to our system of dialectics and resorting instead to the
intellectual see-saw of the well known “on the one hand – on the other
hand,” “yes – but,” “although – however,” “more – less,” etc., he quite
logically lapses into a mode of thought that belongs historically to the
bourgeoisie in decline, being the faithful intellectual reflection of
the social existence and political activity of the bourgeoisie at that
stage. The political “on the one hand – on the other hand,” “yes – but”
of the bourgeoisie today resembles, in a marked degree, Bernstein’s
manner of thinking which is the sharpest and surest proof of the
bourgeois nature of his conception of the world.

 But, as it us used by Bernstein, the word “bourgeois” itself is not a
class expression but a general social notion. Logical to the end he has
exchanged, together with his science, politics, morals and mode of
thinking, the historic language of the proletariat for that of the
bourgeoisie. When he uses, without distinction, the term “citizen” in
reference to the bourgeois as well as to the proletarian intending,
thereby, to refer to man in general, he identifies man in general with
the bourgeois and human society with bourgeois society.



CHAPTER 10  OPPORTUNISM AND THEORY IN PRACTICE


 Bernstein’s book is of great importance to the German and the
international labour movement. It is the first attempt to give a
theoretic base to the opportunist currents common in the
Social-Democracy.

 These currents may be said to have existed for a long time in our
movement, if we take into consideration such sporadic manifestations of
opportunism as the question of subsidisation of steamers. But it is only
since about 1890, with the suppression of the anti-Socialist laws, that
we have had a trend of opportunism of a clearly defined character.
Vollmar’s “State Socialism,” the vote on the Bavarian budget, the
“agrarian socialism” of south Germany, Heine’s policy of compensation,
Schippel’s stand on tariffs and militarism, are the high points in the
development of our opportunist practice.

 What appears to characterise this practice above all? A certain
hostility to “theory.” This is quite natural, for our “theory,” that is,
the principles of scientific socialism, impose clearly marked
limitations to practical activity – insofar as it concerns the aims of
this activity, the means used in attaining these aims and the method
employed in this activity. It is quite natural for people who run after
immediate “practical” results to want to free themselves from such
limitations and to render their practice independent of our “theory.”

 However, this outlook is refuted by every attempt to apply it in
reality. State socialism, agrarian socialism, the policy of
compensation, the question of the army, all constituted defeats to our
opportunism. It is clear that, if this current is to maintain itself, it
must try to destroy the principles of our theory and elaborate a theory
of its own. Bernstein’s book is precisely an effort in that direction.
That is why at Stuttgart all the opportunist elements in our party
immediately grouped themselves around Bernstein’s banner. If the
opportunist currents in the practical activity of our party are an
entirely natural phenomenon which can be explained in the light of the
special conditions of our activity and its development, Bernstein’s
theory is no less natural an attempt to group these currents into a
general theoretic expression, an attempt to elaborate its own theoretic
conditions and the break with scientific socialism. That is why the
published expression of Bernstein’s ideas should be recognised as a
theoretic test for opportunism and as its first scientific
legitimisation.

 What was the result of this test? We have seen the result. Opportunism
is not a position to elaborate a positive theory capable of withstanding
criticism. All it can do is to attack various isolated theses of Marxist
theory and, just because Marxist doctrine constitutes one solidly
constructed edifice, hope by this means to shake the entire system from
the top to its foundation.

 This shows that opportunist practice is essentially irreconcilable with
Marxism. But it also proves that opportunism is incompatible with
socialism (the socialist movement) in general, that its internal
tendency is to push the labour movement into bourgeois paths, that
opportunism tends to paralyse completely the proletarian class struggle.
The latter, considered historically, has evidently nothing to do with
Marxist doctrine. For, before Marx and independently from him, there
have been labour movements and various socialist doctrines, each of
which, in its way, was the theoretic expression corresponding to the
conditions of the time, of the struggle of the working class for
emancipation. The theory that consists in basing socialism on the moral
notion of justice, on a struggle against the mode of distribution,
instead of basing it on a struggle against the mode of production, the
conception of class antagonism as an antagonism between the poor and the
rich, the effort to graft the “co-operative principle” on capitalist
economy – all the nice notions found in Bernstein’s doctrine – already
existed before him. And these theories were, in their time, in spite of
their insufficiency, effective theories of the proletarian class
struggle. They were the children’s seven-league boots thanks to which
the proletariat learned to walk upon the scene of history.

 But after the development of the class struggle and its reflex in its
social conditions had led to the abandonment of these theories and to
the elaboration of the principles of scientific socialism, there could
be no socialism – at least in Germany – outside of Marxist socialism and
there could be no socialist class struggle outside of the
Social-Democracy. Form then on, socialism and Marxism, the proletarian
struggle for emancipation and the Social-Democracy, were identical. That
is why the return to pre-Marxist socialist theories no longer signifies
today a return to the seven-league boots of the childhood of the
proletariat, but a return to the puny worn-out slippers of the
bourgeoisie.

 Bernstein’s theory was the first, and at the same time, the last
attempt to give a theoretic base to opportunism. It is the last, because
in Bernstein’s system, opportunism has gone – negatively through its
renunciation of scientific socialism, positively through its marshalling
of every bit of theoretic confusion possible – as far as it can. In
Bernstein’s book, opportunism has crowned its theoretic development
(just as it completed its practical development in the position taken by
Schippel on the question of militarism), and has reached its ultimate
conclusion.

 Marxist doctrine can not only refute opportunism theoretically. It
alone can explain opportunism as an historic phenomenon in the
development of the party. The forward march of the proletariat, on a
world historic scale, to its final victory is not, indeed, “so simple a
thing.” The peculiar character of this movement resides precisely in the
fact that here, for the first time in history, the popular masses
themselves, in opposition to the ruling classes, are to impose their
will but they must effect this outside of the present society, beyond
the existing society. This will the masses can only form in a constant
struggle against the existing order. The union of the broad popular
masses with an aim reaching beyond the existing social order, the union
of the daily struggle with the great world transformation, that is the
task of the Social-Democratic movement, which must logically grope on
its road of development between the following two rocks: abandoning the
mass character of the party or abandoning its final aim falling into
bourgeois reformism or into sectarianism, anarchism or opportunism.

 In its theoretic arsenal, Marxist doctrine furnished, more than half a
century ago, arms that are effective against both of these two extremes.
But because our movement is a mass movement and because the dangers
menacing it are not derived from the human brain but from social
conditions, Marxist doctrine could not assure us, in advance and once
for always, against the anarchist and opportunist tendencies. The latter
can be overcome only as we pass from the domain of theory to the domain
of practice but only with the help of the arms furnished us by Marx.

   “Bourgeois revolutions,” wrote Marx a half century ago, “like those
  of the eighteenth century, rush onward rapidly from success to
  success, their stage effects outbid one another, men and things seems
  to be set in flaming brilliants, ecstasy is the prevailing spirit; but
  they are short-lived, they reach their climax speedily and then
  society relapses into a long fit of nervous reaction before it learns
  how to appropriate the fruits of its period of feverish excitement.
  Proletarian revolutions, on the contrary, such as those of the
  nineteenth century, criticise themselves constantly; constantly
  interrupt themselves in their own course; come back to what seems to
  have been accomplished, in order to start anew; scorn with cruel
  thoroughness the half-measures, weakness and meanness of their first
  attempts; seem to throw down their adversary only to enable him to
  draw fresh strength from the earth and again to rise up against them
  in more gigantic stature; constantly recoil in fear before the
  undefined monster magnitude of their own objects – until finally that
  situation is created which renders all retreats impossible and
  conditions themselves cry out: ‘Hic Rhodus, hic salta!’ Here is the
  rose. And here we must dance!” (Eighteenth Brumaire)

 This has remained true even after the elaboration of the doctrine of
scientific socialism. The proletarian movement has not as yet, all at
once, become social-democratic, even in Germany. But it is becoming more
social-democratic, surmounting continuously the extreme deviations of
anarchism and opportunism, both of which are only determining phases of
the development of the Social-Democracy, considered as a process.

 For these reasons, we must say that the surprising thing here is not
the appearance of an opportunist current but rather its feebleness. As
long as it showed itself in isolated cases of the practical activity of
the party, one could suppose that it had a serious political base. But
now that it has shown its face in Bernstein’s book, one cannot help
exclaim with astonishment: ”What? Is that all you have to say?” Not the
shadow of an original thought! Not a single idea that was not refuted,
crushed, reduced into dust by Marxism several decades ago!

 It was enough for opportunism to speak out to prove it had nothing to
say. In the history of our party that is the only importance of
Bernstein’s book.

 Thus saying good-bye to the mode of thought of the revolutionary
proletariat, to dialectics and to the materialist conception of history,
Bernstein can thank them for the attenuating circumstances they provide
for his conversion. For only dialectics and the materialist conception
of history, magnanimous as they are, could make Bernstein appear as an
unconscious predestined instrument, by means of which the rising working
class expresses its momentary weakness but which, upon closer
inspection, it throws aside contemptuously and with pride.
